"Different denominations use different confessions, usually based on historical reasons."
Fingerprints are used for the first time to prove identity.
Scientific experts are preferred.
"Passengers are held at secret locations in the capital city, Amman."
Settlers make a land run for prime land in the Cherokee Strip in Oklahoma.
"Animals being poached are bear, musk deer, tiger etc."
Most heroin shipped from India are destined for Europe.
More information is needed here.
Health care costs a lot more today than it did a few years ago.
Some plants are made for medicine for humans.
Tapirs are the only one of the animals hunted by the big cats of the rain forest.
Rain forests are so large and thick that for many years very few people lived or went there.
All heredity is controlled by genes.
Tarantulas are eaten by big snakes and the Tarantula eating wasp.
Car registration is handled by the districts.
Alkanes are saturated hydrocarbons.
"Butane is sold in canisters, for cooking and camping."
Relations are classfied into four types based on mapping of elements.
Babies are born through the space between the three bones of a woman's pelvis.
Poltergeists are said to be invisible.
Poltergeists are said to bother only one person at a time.
Malleability is the ability of a metal to be hammered into thin sheets.
Water has a very slight blue color that can only be seen when there is a lot of water.
"Icebergs are made over very cold waters at either pole, while waters at the equator are pretty warm."
All requests are decided by voting.
Arrowheads are found all over the United States.
Some scientists say that climate change alone caused the extinction of the megafauna.
Mammals are set out by size with largest at the top.
Reasons are described at the English deletion page.
Immediate deletion is requested.
Immediate deletion is requested.
Less people are manual workers and more people get employed in better paid middle-class jobs.
"Painful crisis involves flank, back and thigh pains that can be relieved by treatment."
Coastal areas are moderated somewhat by the Atlantic Ocean.
Students are forced to be at the central high school.
Extensions let a user add new things to the browser or change how it does something.
Endospores are structures made by bacteria for survival purposes.
Proteins are large and complex molecules made of smaller pieces called amino acids.
Many books are published every year in Marathi.
"Matches are sold in multiples, packaged together either in a box, or in matchbooks."
"Polynomials are taught in algebra, which is a gateway course to all technical subjects."
Protein is needed for building cells.
Protein is made of amino acids.
People often eat it in processed foods such as cakes and chocolate.
Autoconfirmed status is needed to be able to move pages and change semi-protected pages.
Some people put things inside other than clothes.
Fibulae are also divided into classes based on their general forms.
Chemical compounds are changed by a chemical reaction.
Red cinnabar is used for the pigment vermilion.
Oases provide a habitat for animals and are used as a source of water for humans.
People are timed and the person who is quickest wins.
"Bacteria are made up of one cell, so they are a kind of 'unicellular organism'."
Bacteria are identified and grouped by their shapes.
Constants are used in maths and computer programming.
"Asteroids are assigned a type based on spectral shape, color, and sometimes albedo."
"Efficient chewing means faster digestion, as the material is broken into smaller pieces."
Decorated architecture has window tracery.
Pressure is applied to an airy substance called gas.
Females are bigger and more brightly coloured.
Many bullfrogs are known to have many viruses and bacteria.
Females are attracted to males who have territories that provide the most food.
Trilobites are the earliest known animal to have vision.
Vacuum pumps are used to pump air out of the chamber.
Additional salt is pumped out through exocrine glands.
Special users are able to check if two or more accounts have been used from the same computer.
Editors are asked to remain civil and assume good faith.
Walruses have lots of things similar to true seals and eared seals.
"Walruses are very big, even compared to big male sea lions."
Organisms become adapted to the environments they live in.
EVE turns on in a big area where the ship's garbage is sent into space.
Neutrons have no charge and protons are positively charged.
Winners are selected based on regular-season play.
Computer programs are designed or written by computer programmers.
Nobody knows who built the first computer.
Microprocessors are miniaturized devices that often implement stored program CPUs.
Disabled children are more likely to be sexually abused than non-disabled children.
Fibers are used to carry phone calls and the Internet between cities.
Hockey pucks are hard disks of rubber that are used to play ice hockey.
Many rocks are named based on what kinds of minerals they have.
Caption given to map if latitude and longitude are used.
"Earwigs usually live in damp, shady places such as under leaves or in fallen trees."
"Jazz music is popular in New Orleans, and the team was named the Jazz when it was in New Orleans."
Horses are used all over the world to carry people and pull carts.
Aphids are found many places on earth.
Incisors are shallowly grooved.
"All species have thick, soft fur, which is considered valuable in some species."
Many languages are spoken in the district.
"Bobcats are eaten by cougars, coyotes, wolves, and owls."
Emergency contraception needs to be applied soon after the unprotected sex.
Releases are signified by version number.
Polyester is used to make insulating carpet.
Most polyesters are made with a polycondensation reaction.
Police officers work to make sure people keep laws made by politicians and judges.
"Parades are held for many reasons, but are usually for celebrations of some kind."
Uniforms numbers are put on the backs of baseball uniforms.
Many teams retire numbers of important players who used to play for their team.
Oats are grown all over temperate places.
"Oats are also an substance used in many cold cereals, in particular muesli and granola."
"Cattle are also fed oats, either whole, or ground into a  flour using a mill."
Pages here have are related to 'trade'.
Fruit is produced to attract animals into eating the fruit.
RAID is used to virtualize computer storage.
"Lift force is produced by the action of air flow on the wing, which is an airfoil."
Some people believe in 'guided evolution' or 'theistic evolution'.
"Mimicry rings, with dozens of species, are known."
Many species are parasites or are specialised to live in one or a few hosts.
Some biologists use the term for evolution in already separated gene pools.
Some amino acids are coded by two or more different triplets of DNA base pairs.
Lands now known as Algeria and Morocco become a Roman province.
Betas are known as the fighting fish.
Carbon dioxide is made in the reactions between most acids and most metal carbonates.
Carbon dioxide is made in steel mills.
Most people think that the disease was the bubonic plague.
"Payment is required for pre-registration, which is revised every year."
"Serfdom is the forced labour of serfs, on the fields of the land owners."
"Yeast is single-celled, and reproduces either sexually or asexually."
Bare pottery objects without a glaze are called 'bisque'.
"Balls are dropped from the top, and bounce left and right as they hit the pins."
Specialists take 'samples' which are later analyzed in a laboratory.
Commercial progress is limited because it is very near the border between India and Pakistan.
Turkey has a footballing tradition that has been good and bad.
Ocean liners are used for transportation.
"Cruise ships are different, they are used for pleasure."
"Feudal society is based on two principles, that of feudalism and manorialism."
Players can go back to any level in the world that they have played by going through doors.
"Options are left, right, both, or none."
Winners are decided by the general public.
Tiger sharks are known to have a wide variety of prey.
Doctors decide a patient has gout if they find crystals in the joint fluid.
Diuretics are associated with attacks of gout.
Food is arranged to be aesthetically pleasing.
Schools help people recognise socially accepted norms and behaviour.
"Wayfarer means wanderer, and the book's title implied that masts are on a spiritual journey."
Grant goes out there fights but is sucked into the engine of the plane.
Nothing is known for certain about their use of tools.
Some ghost towns are kept intact as tourist attractions.
Cicadas are related to leafhoppers and spittlebugs.
Autoconfirmed status is required to move pages and edit semi-protected pages.
Active players are listed in 'boldface'.
Fans are used when it's very hot.
Legend says the opera was based on a real-life incident that occurred in Vienna.
Agents make their money by taking a percentage of the money that their client is paid.
Some continents are used in more than one game.
Horned dilemmas can present more than two choices.
"Peaks are covered with evergreen trees including pine, walnut, oak and maple trees."
Houseflies are grey or black and can be found wherever people are.
Gnats are small flies that sometimes are in big groups called 'swarm's.
Rivets are used to make different pieces of iron stay together.
Most cocoa today is made in Africa.
Assembly language provides what is called an abstraction of machine code.
Different notes are made by fingering with the left hand while bowing with the right.
Costs are relatively low and most equipment can be used year after year.
Flies fly via straight sequences of movement interspersed by rapid turns called 'saccades'.
Wolves have fur made up of two layers.
Young wolves are called 'pups' or 'cubs'.
Wolves make a noise called a howl.
"Wolves are found in Europe, Asia and North America."
Some people say that the atomic bombs actually saved many lives.
Many haunted houses are believed to contain ghosts.
Dead vermin can also cause unusual smells often associated with hauntings.
"Domesticated ferrets are used for hunting, or can be kept as pets."
People can visit the island for hiking and camping by getting the permission needed.
Mayors are chosen democratically every four years by the canton's people.
More blood flows in through the corpus cavernosum and the clitoris is filled with blood.
Chickens are well known for their eggs.
"Floppy disks are used for moving information between computers, laptops or other devices."
"Sex is as frequent as it is casual, a social tool used to strengthen and maintain bonds."
Most discs are designed to create lift when thrown with the flat side up.
"Many templates are based upon it, like ."
Categories are ignored if the template is used on a talk page or on any other non-article page.
Some viruses use something called polymorphic code to change their signature every time they move.
"Snipers usually wear camouflage clothing, to avoid being seen."
Most police snipers are trained by the military.
Some snipers are famous for having killed hundreds of enemy soldiers.
Some historians think that some important historical people had learning difficulties.
Honey badgers live alone in self-dug holes.
Honey badgers have the least specialised diet among mustelids.
Bears are known to attack humans for many reasons but actually they avoid attacking.
People following other religions can also feel called to do a certain job by their gods.
Subsidiarity is one of the ideas used in federalism.
Users receive a prominent notification when new messages have been left on their talk page.
Mathematics can describe how fluids move using mathematical formulas called equations.
Messages are sent and received very quickly from around the globe.
Present thought is that their closest living relatives are the monitor lizards.
Reservoirs are used to store water for various uses like drinking.
"Jars are usually cylindrical, and are usually made of glass or clay."
"Polarization of light is useful, after it has been filtered."
Aboriginal makers spend a lot of time looking for a tree that has been hollowed out by termites.
Modern scholars question whether a Median empire even existed.
Headshots are used in the modelling and acting businesses.
Many people think that women demand more foreplay and require more time to become aroused.
Some dates are wikilinked.
Babies born prematurely die more often in their first year of life than others.
Adults are said to be slow and sluggish but when disturbed they become aggressive.
"Hoatzins can fly only short distances even when they are fully grown, so they usually climb."
"Cucumbers are fruits, and are often called vegetables."
Players are set to make their own calls and partake in conflict resolution.
All basic settings are controlled by text files.
Messages are stuck into the bricks.
"Lentils are sold in many forms, with or without the skins, whole or split."
"Lentils are used throughout India, the Mediterranean regions and the Middle East."
Lentils are relatively tolerant to drought and are grown throughout the world.
"Italic parameters are optional, bold required."
Shelf life is the length of time that food can be stored.
"Shelf life is linked to food quality, expiration date to food safety."
Any comments are appreciated.
"Science parks are found all over the world, but they mostly exist in developed countries."
Food coloring is used both in commercial food production and in cooking at home.
"Dyes are manufactured as powders, granules, liquids or other special purpose forms."
Entry is gained by contactless smart card rather than the usual manned turnstile.
Services are limited due to the small size of the station.
Carpenters wear aprons made of heavy leather that have many pockets to hold tools.
All cells are made by other cells.
Unicellular organisms are made up of one cell.
Multicellular organisms are made from many cells.
Annuals are released each year.
Black people are more likely than white people to be sentenced to death for a crime.
Phagocytes are very important in fighting infections and in getting rid of dead and dying cells.
"Canyon is another name for it, used in other countries."
Sensors are used in everyday objects.
Some tablets are inscribed with nothing more than the names of the targets.
Many turtles are killed when they get caught in fishing nets.
"Guitars are used as rhythm instruments, lead instruments, and sometimes both."
Most animations are played at a speed of twenty-four to sixty images every second.
Architects are employed again and so the city changes.
"Beechwood burns well and is used, among other woods, to smoke herrings in Scotland."
Pregnancy is divided into three parts called 'trimesters'.
Different countries have laws about induced abortions.
Animal life is found on all levels.
"Cloves are used in cooking, whole or ground."
Most species live in nests called 'forms'.
"Some roofs are sloped, or pitched, so the rain and snow fall off easily."
Some pitched roofs have parts that stick out for windows.
Bricks are made of clay.
Health supplements enriched with antioxidants are also now widely available.
Strychnine is one of the most bitter substances known.
Cholesterol is a special type of lipid that is called a steroid.
Cholesterol is a special type of lipid that is called a steroid.
Cholesterol is found especially in animal fats.
Medics can help their teammates get better after they get shot.
Objects made by prehistoric people are called artifacts.
Endocrine means something that is made by cells and released 'into' the blood or tissue.
Hormones released by one gland can also tell 'other' glands to make 'different' hormones.
Some glucose is used by the cells but some is also converted to and stored in the form of glycogen.
"Logic is the study of how meanings are related to each other, and how to make good decisions."
Sulphur dioxide is produced by volcanoes and in various industrial processes.
"Humans are mammals, and have developed by a process of evolution."
Blood is carried in blood vessels.
Blood going to the heart is carried in veins.
Blood going away from the heart is carried in arteries.
Most heart disease is acquired.
Arrows point to infected red blood cells.
Blood is put on a slide which is a thin piece of glass.
Doctors choose the medicines by where in the world the person got malaria.
Blood is moved by the pumping of the heart and carries oxygen to the tissues.
Questions are answered quickly even with help from volunteer teachers from all over the whole world.
Proteins are made from 'amino acids'.
Kingfishers are found all over the world.
Testicles are a type of organ called glands.
Testicles are a type of organ called glands.
"Boys begin making sperm when they start growing into men, at a time of life called puberty."
Most boys are born with two testicles in the scrotum.
Most male cattle are castrated.
Igneous rocks are rocks formed from molten magma.
Most ulcers are caused by an infection from bacteria.
Information is told by the positions of the flags.
Calcium carbonate is used as a calcium supplement.
Binary information is used for computer storage.
Babies have a reflex to suck everything that is put in their mouth.
Linguistic purity is about avoiding foreign influences to a language because they are seen as bad.
Children are graded on how well they currently handling their situation.
Psychoanalysis is a form of therapy based off of Psychoanalytic theory.
Scion is marketed to young car buyers.
Guinea pigs like to be held in hand.
Guinea pig is also slang for a person who is the first to try something.
"Autopsies are done by specialised doctors, called pathologists."
Most economists believe that it started in the United States.
Soy yoghurt is made from soy milk.
"Maps are made out of cubes, which can be made longer or shorter and can be reshaped."
New research shows that the events happened at an hotel on the other side of the river.
Nervous system contains neurons and cells called glia.
Some vaccines are synthetic vaccines that are made in a laboratory.
Digital signature are implemented using cryptography.
Asymmetric algorithms are used to distribute symmetric-keys at the start of a session.
Duke crash lands back on Earth and finds most humans are gone.
"Candelas are measured using green light, which human eyes are very sensitive to."
Entertainment lawyers are used by some to look over any contract before it is signed.
Classical ciphers are typically susceptible to known-plaintext attack.
Muscles are made of many muscle cells.
Muscle cells are filled with proteins called 'actin' and 'myosin'.
Most pain starts when part of the body is hurt.
Competitions are held regularly in most villages.
Diffusion is associated with the dependency of the output bits on the input bits.
"Abortions can occur naturally, usually because something went wrong with the pregnancy."
Induced abortion is a subject that is controversial.
Digital clocks work by measuring the vibrations of quartz crystals when charged with electricity.
Insectivorous plants have leaves that are made like pitchers or bladders which catch insects.
"Insects land on the leaf, are caught by the surface tension of the water, and suffocate."
Smileys are used by many people in emails and other types of computer messages.
Oral sex is the term given to genital stimulation by the mouth.
All development is governed by genes which regulate the process of growth.
"Embedded systems are designed to do a specific task, unlike general-purpose computers."
Sugar gliders are actually related to possums.
"Sugar gliders are most popular as pets in the United States, where they are bred in large numbers."
Banners are the informative ones that are placed on talk pages.
Peritoneal dialysis is when doctors put a plastic tube into the person's abdomen.
Branch prediction is used with speculative execution.
Floods can cut transport links to the town and cut it off from the outside world.
Human sperm is made in the testicles of a man.
"Some orchids have underground tubers, which are swollen roots used by plants for storing food."
Honey is sweet and can be used instead of sugar.
Some common types are derived from bees who use the clover flower's pollen.
Pizza is cooked in a oven.
Some people believe that life begins after a baby is born.
Special markers are used that can be erased.
"Some biologists study using cells in factories and companies, and that is called biotechnology."
Chloroform is used as a solvent.
"Men are advised to feel each testicle, feeling for pea-shaped lumps."
Some groups of people are more likely to be sexually abused than others.
Atoms are made up of particles.
Organs are made up of more than one kind of tissue.
Programs are composed of instructions which operate on values.
Scientists think that solar systems are created out of a huge cloud of gas.
"Some women have pain in the low part of the abdomen when they menstruate, known as cramps."
Many species are critically endangered.
Naloxone is used in emergency cases of overdose.
"Jewelry can come in many forms, worn on any part of the body or clothing."
Pasties are worn by many neo-burlesque performers.
Potassium hydroxide is used in the electrolyte of alkaline cells.
"Potassium compounds are used in soap, fertilizer, explosives, and matches."
Potassium metal is very dangerous and can form an explosive coating if it is kept in air.
"Prairie dogs are found in the United States, Canada, and Mexico."
Some words can have a hyphen added to change the meaning.
Observatories are used by astronomers to look at the sky.
Branch prediction is used with speculative execution.
Western culture expects that both men and women keep their genitals covered.
Much human attention is needed for bulldog to be happy.
Installments are paid according to a loan rate.
Interest is paid according to a rate called an interest rate.
Unsecured loans are loans that are given without pledges of repayment.
Home loans are loans that are taken for the purpose of buying a house.
Home loans are secured loans.
Payday loans are given on the basis of employment and income.
Mortgage is a loan that is used specifically to purchase a house.
Some species have large cloacal cavities that are lined with many finger-like projections.
"Turtles lay eggs, like other reptiles, which are slightly soft and leathery."
"Sea turtles lay their eggs on dry, sandy beaches."
"All persons are born free and equal, because they have reason and conscience."
"Symbols are used in Aboriginal art, to show the presence of different things."
Similar adaptations are found in pinnipeds like seals.
Machine screws have threads which have to be matched with nuts with female threads.
Screw threads are measured either in millimeters or in numbers.
Babies are called joeys.
Hebrew words are made by combining a root with a pattern.
"Hedgehogs have long spines, or quills, made of keratin."
Enemies are found randomly.
Small churches are called chapels.
Dragons leave about twenty eggs in empty nests left by birds called megapodes.
"Losers usually run away, although sometimes they are chased and eaten by the winners."
Monster trucks are used for competition and popular entertainment.
Patterns are tattooed on chest and stomach for ornament.
Women eat apart and only after the men have finished.
Tournaments are what people often see when poker is shown on television.
Galagos are all arboreal and known for their ability to leap great distances among branches.
Most flutes are made of silver.
English ocarinas are made in many shapes.
Most bathing is done in hot water or hot steam.
Poor expression can be simple but still needs to be edited.
Muskrats often build dome-shaped houses in marshes.
Strains are used in laboratory experiments.
Electric current is perceived as flowing in the opposite direction that the electrons are flowing.
Many different items are made in the town.
Closures keep the state of their bound variables over several invocations.
Axons are much like a highly developed dendrite.
Insulation is provided by specialized cells called myelin that wrap around the axon.
Media ownership is said to be concentrated usually in one or more of the following ways.
Hand grenades are used by the infantry.
Scientists announce that they have created a form of synthetic life.
Israeli forces storm the Gaza-bound international flotilla in the Mediterranean Sea.
Headset is made up of two parts.
Most important problem involved in the practical use of hydrogen car is hydrogen storage materials.
Some basses feature pickups that can be set to passive or active mode.
Sounds are produced from the strings in a number of ways.
Picking is sometimes combined with muting techniques to create distinctive sounds.
Comparisons are made between the ego-ideal and one's actual behavior.
Bots are included.
Dipole antennas are used for many different things.
Some cactus flowers bloom at night and are pollinated by moths and bats.
"Some cacti are grown in gardens, especially in dry areas."
Cold deserts are covered with snow or ice.
"Some desserts are decorated, like birthday cakes."
Some desserts are served with whipped cream as a topping.
Baked desserts are made by putting the ingredients in a hot oven.
Frozen desserts are made by blending the ingredients in a freezer.
Fire engines pump water and foam which is used to put out the fire.
Some engines carry first aid kits to help people who are injured or hurt.
Charge exchange can happen in conditions like when different objects are rubbed and separated.
China is ruled by a communist government.
Ample time needs to be provided to give anyone reasonable time to voice their opinion.
Food is strained from the water by gill rakers in the gill slits.
"Some schools are affiliated with a specific promotion company, others are independent."
Nitrous oxide is used by doctors and dentists to reduce pain.
Nitrous oxide is used in high performance cars to increase the power of their engines.
Some breads are fried.
Some foods are good to eat either raw or cooked and can be used in different recipes.
Some people think that the unicorn of legend was based upon the oryx.
Plumbing fixtures are designed for the people who use the water.
"Pugs have strong, straight legs and laid back shoulders."
Yellow fever is spread through the bite of an infected mosquito.
Locomotives are sub-categorised according to type.
"Ferries are used across seas, lakes and rivers."
Red giants get their name because they appear to be colored red and they are very large.
People often sing along when it is played.
"Many hybrids exist, both natural and created by humans."
Towns are listed in 'bold'.
Clean technologies are seen to be important for economic growth.
Towns are run through an elected officer system.
"Children read the wiki, yes."
Some printing presses use lead type because it can be easily shaped.
"Most lead is used in lead acid batteries, though."
Many lead compounds are used to make colored glazes in ceramics.
Some lead compounds are semiconductors and are used in photodetectors.
Most bells are made of metal.
"Cider costs less than wine, and is often served in pubs and other places where young people go."
Mail is delivered to the island by helicopter.
Socialism is placed in between capitalism and communism.
"Wild hamsters live in the desert, but people all over the world keep domesticated hamsters as pets."
Children are given baskets filled with candy.
Eggs are decorated and hidden for children to find.
Greeting cards are exchanged.
ICs are designed for different purposes.
Winter is warm compared to most other cities in Australia.
"Some anime is drawn by hand, but anime can also be made with computers."
"Concerts continue to be given there including, more recently, concerts of popular music."
Pipes are connections from the host controller to a logical entity on the device named an endpoint.
"Most systems allow for dry, greasy, chaffed and minor cuts on the fingers."
Rants are used often in situations requiring monologue.
"All organs are surrounded by capillaries, and are made up of tissues."
Modern implants are made up of cylinders that are put inside the corpora cavernosa penis.
Many illnesses are caused by disease or disorders.
"Football is the most popular sport in Qatar, closely followed by cricket."
Consent is when someone agrees of their own choice without being forced to.
Some people are worried about women lying about being raped and men getting unfairly punished.
Rays use spiracles to take in water that is then sent over the gills.
Most jellyfish have a bell-shaped body and long tentacles at the underside of the body.
Collections are made in England for needy French refugees.
Horses are used in many different competitions.
Underwear is worn for many reasons.
Hatred of women is called misogyny.
Hatred of men is called misandry.
"Mules are more common, and have been used for transportation of people and things."
Cheese is used in some dishes.
"Eggs are laid one by one under old leaves of the hostplant, and are green or grey-blue."
"Ribosomes are found in all living cells, prokaryotes as well as eukaryotes."
Vavilovian mimicry is caused by unintentional selection by humans.
Tomatoes are used a lot in Italian food.
Peach blossoms are carried by Chinese brides.
Figs are pollinated by fig wasps.
White grapes are derived from the red grape by evolution.
Saltwater crocodiles are now a protected species in Australia.
Divisions are divided into districts.
Scientific notation is used to track the decimal point in more formal calculations.
Terraces are level places that have been made by people on hill sides.
Hamsters are small animals which are kept as pets.
Some reptiles are more closely related to birds than they are to other reptiles.
Crocodiles are more closely related to birds than they are to lizards.
Bohemians is the only club who always played in the top division.
"Mice are rodents, therefore they are related to squirrels, rats, and beavers."
"Every unit can move along the playing field, which is split up into squares."
Defense is how much damage it can avoid taking whenever it is attacked.
"Some people think that it is a misnomer, or a wrongly given name."
Many passes are closed in winter.
Nobody knows why the boat actually sunk.
Ctenophores are the most basal known type of animals.
Smoothies are a type of cold drink made with an electric blender.
Locomotive class are listed by TOPS class.
Site still possesses many well preserved ruins side by side with rich history.
Famous beer is made there.
Members are elected for four-year terms.
Dessert wines are called 'stickies' in Australia.
Many suppliers are compared to many consumers.
"Monkey brains are eaten in some parts of Africa, South Asia, and China."
"Females make up to two groups, called clutches per year depending on season, climate."
Adults lay eggs in crevasses in the bark.
"Mission Beach is a good place to see the cassowary, an endangered flightless bird."
Stewards are always around if needed.
Many recipes are known from ancient Greece.
Materials used in spin valves are copper and an alloy of nickel and iron.
Entertainers are listed under their place of birth or where they grew up.
Fifth card is dealt.
Xylophones have bars which are made of wood.
"All axioms are supposed to be true, even without a proof."
Thorns help protect the plant from being eaten.
Some leaves are used to store energy in bulbs.
Carnivorous plants use adapted leaves to capture their prey.
"Worms spread over networks, or on removable media like USB flash drives."
Leonese language is taught in sixteen schools.
Cylindrical ones are called carbon nanotubes or buckytubes.
Today there are some highways numbered U.S. highways and state routes that run through downtown.
Blocks are meant to be preventive.
Most open proxies are due to the computer being infected by a virus without the user's knowledge.
"Discussion happens, but both are firmly resolved."
"Spotted dogs are known very much in the history of Africa, Europe, and Asia."
Obesity is associated with greater health problems than overweight.
Any user can remove the redirect and propose that the page be deleted.
Captions are displayed outside of the table.
Coconut crabs are extremely high priced in the national food market.
Many products are made from plant sap.
Maple syrup is made using sap from sugar maple trees.
Police think the fire was deliberately lit.
"Most experience is developed by trial, error and practice."
People are associated with the animal for the year that they are born.
Larger books are cheaper if judged by cost per page.
Books are shipped using a standard shipping option to most countries in the world.
Content needs to be split up on several pages.
All books maintained by the community are in the list of community books.
Good books are focused on a certain topic and cover it as well as possible.
Employers are to protect employees and other persons from the hazards of substances used at work.
Some rubies are colored the color shown in the color chart below as 'rich carmine'.
Red phosphorus can burn but needs to be ignited.
White phosphorus is used in incendiary weapons and smoke grenades.
Red phosphorus is used in matches and flares.
Distances measured in fractions of a parsec usually involve objects within the same star system.
"Network bridges work similarly to network switches, but the traffic is managed differently."
Heat sinks are found in most computers.
Compression is when all of the fuel is squeezed.
Strategic bombers are bombers used to bomb cities and camps used by the opposing force.
Howitzers are special because they're made to fire higher than a cannon but lower than a mortar.
People also do many different things to try to get rid of mosquitoes.
Dengue fever is caused by the dengue virus.
Dengue is the most common viral disease that is spread by arthropods.
"Dengue is thought to be the second most important tropical disease, behind malaria."
Several things are thought to be causing the increase in dengue.
Water is the easiest way to get rid of wallpaper.
"Oppression comes from the concept of being weighted down, and is often shown as such."
Potassium nitrate is used in explosives.
"Different batons are used by different people, for different things."
"Policemen often carry batons, which can be used as weapons."
Quarks are held together by gluons.
"Modern tracks are made of concrete, coated with ice."
Trap doors are popular in mystery themed movies.
Biplanes have a stronger structure but they produce more drag than normal fixed-wing aircraft.
"White chocolate is made of cocoa butter, milk, and sugar."
Loons are found in most parts of North America and Eastern Europe.
Crossbows shoot short arrows called 'bolts' which are similar to arrows.
Many crossbows have crank or windlass mechanisms to pull the string in drawn position.
Doctors can also look into the patient's intestines with a camera on a tube called an endoscope.
"Smaller ones are thought to be very beautiful, bigger ones are often seen as priceless works of art."
Comments are welcommed.
Most stations are named for the nearby road crossed by the line in question.
Viscosity is used as a way to predict when volcanoes erupt.
Ice cubes are made by filling a tray with water and putting it in a freezer.
"Trays are often flexible, so the ice cubes can be removed easily by flexing the tray."
Any set is made of points.
Metrosexual men are known to act like the stereotypical homosexual man.
Most cheeses are acidified by bacteria.
Cheese is made using milk.
Bureaucrats can grant and revoke the bot flag to and from non-admins when needed.
Pillars made of dense cold gas are visible.
Stations are owned by a  or a grazing company.
Drovers are employed in looking after the livestock while they are travelling on a stock route.
Some limited exceptions are described below.
"Bubble gum is made with organic latex, a milky fluid produced by a variety of seed plants."
Some paper clips are made to look good.
Seismologists can find the location of earthquakes by plotting received vibrations on a map.
"Elephants are known to tear down trees and feed on their leaves, making trees even more scarce."
Many women die or get a disease because they had an unsafe abortion.
Training is required to go solo.
Albumin is found in blood serum.
All consonants have a built-in vowel.
All vertices are connected by edges except opposite pairs.
Babies are born about five weeks after mating.
"Ocean currents are created by wind, water temperature, salt content, and the gravity of the moon."
Immigrants provide a large amount of the work done in farms in the Central Valley.
"Zooids are very small, highly modified individuals."
Editors are encouraged to review it for accuracy.
Cliffs are known for forming major geographical features such as waterfalls.
Crossings are listed from south to north.
Cashmere wool is well-known almost anywhere in the world.
Operationalism is found in other sciences.
Users are prompted before such information is able to be transmitted.
"Sika deer are native to Taiwan to Japan, but they have been introduced to many parks in Europe."
Paws are used to pad feet for walking and reduce friction.
Cassettes store the sound on a magnetic tape that is wound around the two reels in the cassette.
All man needs is to get lost in Tao.
"Sugar cane is the largest cash crop grown in Cuba, and it brings in most of the money."
Tobacco is made into cigars by hand.
Most forks are made of metal.
Dopamine is an important chemical found in the brain.
Auditions are held in many European capital cities.
Cabbage is eaten in many ways around the world.
Yellow marrow is made mainly of fat cells.
Yellow marrow is found inside the hollow middle section of the long bones.
Organisms also use stem cells to replace damaged cells during their lifetime.
Bombs are made more dangerous because of shockwaves.
"Medical doctors give out prescriptions, which can then be used to get the drug."
Mononucleosis is well known for being spread through kissing.
Lead needs to be expanded.
Most ligatures are made from metal or plastic.
Cymbals are made in different sizes.
Cymbals are used in many different musical groups.
Books are done.
Article is reviewed.
Comments are welcomed.
Hormones are made by glands in the body.
Time zones are assumed to be local to the event.
"Biologists estimate that it had the most powerful bite of any mammal, alive or extinct."
Tentacles are used for locomotive power and capturing food sources.
Giant squid are featured in literature and folklore with a frightening connotation.
"Prices are based on delivery in New York City harbor, the main cash market trading center."
Some real numbers are called positive.
Studio albums are recorded at a recording studio.
Fanfares are used today as music at the start of television and radio news programs.
Ice hockey is played on ice.
Octets are used in the technology field very often.
Many people let the beans cook slowly all day.
Risotto is a class of Italian rice dishes cooked in broth to a creamy consistency.
Filters are used to enhance contrast.
"Modernism is marked by a rejection of tradition, and an interest in new ways of doing old things."
Modern art is what replaced classical art.
"Chinchillas are rodents, but pikas are related to the hare and the rabbit, they are 'lagomorphs'."
Magazines are printed on paper.
Fancy rats are domesticated brown rats.
Rats are social and smart animals that can be trained.
Some scientists believe that the plague spread faster than the rats.
"Every footnote references the same, online version of said book."
Every bot has to be approved.
"Plastic cutlery is used for eating fast food, because it can be thrown away."
Many vases are decorated or painted but some are left plain.
Some areas are controlled by armed militant groups.
Comic strips posted on the internet are 'web comics'.
Negative numbers are left of zero on a number line.
Negative numbers are used in accounting and science.
"Hailstones are made of many rings of clear, cloudy ice."
"Filament is made up mostly of tungsten, a type of metal."
"Most bulbs get very hot when they are turned on, and take some time to cool off."
"Most light bulbs are made of glass, which means that they can break easily."
Electric systems are made of electric cables that are laid underneath the floor.
Electric panels can reduce energy costs if panels are left turned off in empty rooms.
Crowns are awarded or won at contests.
"Some bulbs grown for the decorative flowers are the lily, tulip, and some irises."
"Gluons carry the strong force between other quarks, so it is considered a force carrying particle."
"Information is found in libraries, online, and by asking people."
Ideas are concepts created in the mind.
Wires are used to make connections.
Sticker photos are instant photos printed on sticker-based material.
Electricity is generated by solar panels and stored in batteries.
Parties are held once a month with a different theme every time.
"All editors are invited, named and anon alike."
"Activities run during the year included observatory tours, shows, and photograph displays."
Encryption is used to store the code in a secret way.
Tips are made of lightweight plastic plates that are nail-shaped.
Forms are fitted over the nail.
Antibiotics are given to treat any bacterial infection present.
Most earthworms can regrow lost segments.
"Most wires are black, but sometimes wires can have a differently colored coating."
"Physics looks at how nature is made, and how different fields of nature relate to each other."
Geology looks at how the earth developed and what it looks like.
Rock music is related to a number of other genres such as blues and folk.
Rock music is song-based.
Templates are used within pages to provide the same message over and over again.
Science is based on facts and observations.
"Many people live by doing what is called subsistence agriculture, on a small farm."
"Many farms also use machines, which cut down on the number of people needed to farm the land."
Passwords let players stop the game and come back to it later.
Most conventions bring famous people to the convention who are called guests.
"Harmonicas are used in blues music, folk music, rock and roll music, and pop music."
Harmonicas are played by blowing or sucking air into one side.
"Some insomnias are caused by stimulant drugs, such as amphetamine, cocaine and nicotine."
Anglican priests are ordained by their bishop.
Most people think that 'why' the person was killed is very important.
International law says that nations have to say when they put mines in an area.
"Plantains are a staple food in tropical regions, treated similarly to potatoes."
Human messengers tend to be called prophets.
Oversight is used to remove harmful personal information.
Great attention is to be paid to regularity and choice of diet.
North Cascades National Park is located at the northernmost end of the North Cascades.
"Many banks are based in Frankfurt, and the city has some of the tallest buildings in Europe."
Black cardamom has coolness similar to that of mint.
Geology is divided into special subjects that study one part of geology.
Igneous rock is rock that has been made by volcanic action.
Sedimentary rock is rock that has been made from sediment.
"Some sedimentary rocks are made of just one type of sediment, all about the same size, such as sand."
Earthquakes are caused when a fault breaks suddenly.
Statistics say that three boys are affected for one girl.
Retrievers retrieve game once it is killed.
Education is guaranteed by a network of public schools that span from nursery school to university.
"All users are invited to ask the candidates, if there are questions."
Women also do pottery and the pots are bought and taken to markets.
Some cities have small areas where graffiti can be made.
Classical philosophy is the philosophy developed in Ancient Greece.
Prisons are run by the government.
People held in prisons are called inmates or prisoners.
"Mail is delivered by helicopter, weather permitting."
"Most animation is made the same way, whether it is cel animation or stop motion."
Paisley designs are called motifs.
Pot stills are used for making alcohol like whisky.
Calculators are found everywhere.
Silver bromide is used in film.
Metals can catch on fire when placed in a stream of fluorine.
Chemical compounds containing fluorine ions are called fluorides.
"Several fluorides are found in the earth, though."
Fluorine is used to enrich uranium for nuclear weapons.
Iodides react with acidified manganese dioxide or chlorine to make iodine.
Most iodine now is extracted from seawater.
Chlorine is reacted with seawater to change the iodide to iodine.
Air is blown over the water to evaporate the iodine.
Some metals are purified using their iodides.
Silver iodide is used in photographic film and cloud seeding.
Iodine turns colorless when mixed with a reducing agent.
Iodides become colored when mixed with oxidizing agents.
"Ballots are counted, and a series of simulated rounds is conducted."
Icons are used in many places on a computer.
"Someone says that a boat has been seen sinking out to sea, but no one is interested."
Fossil fuels produce a lot of pollution when burned.
Children are taught what is good behaviour and what is bad behaviour.
Attention is given to safety at all times.
"Taxes are added by federal, state and local governments."
Brazilian ethanol is produced from sugar cane and noted for high carbon sequestration.
Tropical cyclones are classified into different categories depending on their strength and location.
Sovereignty is a word that is often used wrongly.
Most bisexual porn is made by small companies rather than the major studios.
Unsaturated fat is better for people than saturated fat.
"Literacy is used to look at how educated people are, for example how many adults can read and write."
Garbage is the waste produced daily in our homes.
Some guns have a built-in suppressor.
"Ducks are closely related to swans and geese, which are in the same family."
Some ducks are bred and kept by humans.
"All ideas are welcome, and 'everyone' is invited to participate."
Leaves are usually hairy and arranged in opposite pairs.
Football seasons looks to be the master category for a majority of the pages that are to be deleted.
Intrusive volcanism is when magma is forced into the rocks that make up the Earth's crust.
"Monks enter, followed by the unfortunate people who are going to be burnt."
Whale meat is used for food.
"Whales have a thick layer of fat, or blubber, that can be melted down to make oil."
"SNOW is 'never' used in discussions, end of."
Tin can make an alloy with copper called bronze.
Tin is made by heating cassiterite with carbon in a furnace.
Tin is used in solder.
"Tin is used to coat several metals, like lead and steel."
Tin plated steel containers are used to store foods.
Stars are created from nebula and first appear on the main sequence.
Sand is a compound of silicon known as silicon dioxide or silica.
Bismuth telluride is used in electronic thermometers.
Iridium belongs to a group of metals known as transition metals.
Many health problems are associated with obesity.
Risk is associated with where the excess fat is stored on the body.
Some lichen are eaten by humans.
"Harrow is an independent fee-paying school, of the type known in Britain as 'public schools'."
Some flu viruses are caught from animals.
Chlorophyll gives leaves their green color and absorbs light that is used in photosynthesis.
Armed robbery means that the robber used weapons such as a gun in the robbery.
Twined baskets have flexible weavers that are twined around the spokes in a variety of patterns.
Catalysts are useful because they leave no  in the solution they have speeded up.
People put things in a 'container'.
Vectors are used to show distances and directions.
All concerns are fixed.
"Smaller regions are administered by divisions, union conferences and local conferences."
Crops are selected such that their nutrient requirements are different.
Vavilovian mimicry is caused by unintentional selection by humans.
Fuzzy logic is used a lot in expert systems and neural networks.
All TVs have screens where the picture is viewed.
"Many people like to eat salmon, so the fish is also grown in fish farms."
Patent trolls make a lot of people unhappy because the money paid is a lot like a tax.
Monarchs are known for their long annual migration.
Monarch butterflies are known for their long annual migration.
Labels are placed on the wing of the butterfly.
Drawings are made.
Beer is made by adding warm water to malted barley and other grains.
Some beers ferment sponaneously from yeast that can be found in the environment.
Barium is part of a group of elements known as the alkaline earth metals.
Scandium is a metal in a group known as the transition metals.
Some arsenic compounds are used as poison gases.
Pure manganese is made by reacting the manganese ore with sulfuric acid and electrolyzing it.
Some manganese compounds cause toxicity when ingested.
Spiders have a set of appendages on their faces called pedipalps.
"Names are listed in wikified form, without flags."
"Countries are listed in unwikified form, without flags."
"Wider gauges are called broad gauge, smaller gauges are called narrow gauge."
"Narrow gauge is used to build railroads for less money, because the smaller track costs less."
"Skittles made in Victoria, Australia are sold in the Australian and New Zealand markets."
Common sense overrules all policies if applied correctly.
"Most dishes are light, as they are cooked in lots of water."
Bosnian cuisine is balanced between Western and Eastern influences.
List includes article name requested followed by number of pages that references it.
English teachers say run-on sentences are wrong.
Tennis is now a sport that is played at the Olympics.
White dots represent water-filled sinkholes in the limestone rocks of the region.
"Saints are synonymous, or are associated, with holiness."
"Many cookbooks are modified when reprinted, some adding recipes."
"Bans are made by the community, usually for project disruption."
Most disputes are solved elsewhere.
"Celluloid catches fire very easily and also easily breaks down, and is no longer widely used."
Sarayu river is mentioned in Ramayana.
Smileys typed on the computer are called emoticons.
Gliders are controlled by their pilots by using control-sticks.
Joints are described structurally and functionally.
Perfection is neither desired nor achievable.
Resources are gathered by worker units.
"Minerals are needed for all units and buildings, and come as blue crystals from the ground."
"Children are dressed up, and go from house to house begging for money."
Translation is described by b parameter and dilatation by a parameter.
Earthquakes are measured using observations from seismometers.
Earthquakes are caused by tectonic movements in the Earth's crust.
Normal faults occur mainly in areas where the crust is being extended.
Reverse faults occur in areas where the crust is being shortened.
"Most earthquakes form part of a sequence, related to each other in terms of location and time."
Aftershocks are formed as the crust adjusts to the effects of the main shock.
Different combinations are used.
Envelopes are used for sending letters or documents using regular postal mail.
Most sherbets are flavored with fruit flavors.
Reconstruction filters are given by time reversal analysis filters.
"Food colouring is used to colour food, but some foods have natural colourings, like beta carotene."
Most vandalism is gone pretty quickly.
"Question marks are used when writing a question, to make an inquiry, or to ask something."
Some words can have a hyphen added to change the meaning.
Surfaces are studied in geometry.
All mechanical machines are made by combining simple machines.
British forces are defeated by American troops.
Some ions are coloured.
Positive ions are called 'cations'.
Negative ions are called 'anions'.
Many misanthropes are labeled as hermits and loners.
"Some rotifers are free swimming, others move by inching along, and some are fixed."
"Illusions are based on real perceptions, which are distorted or interpreted in a wrong way."
Some illegal drugs are taken because they cause hallucinations.
Shanghai is fortified for the first time.
Noradrenaline is released during stress.
"Ethanol is oxidized from the liquid, resulting in vinegar."
Insects are very tough animals that have adapted to a great variety of settings.
"Every soldier answers to someone else, so that way, everything is organized."
Parfaits are made differently in different countries.
"Many parrots are vividly coloured, and some are multi-coloured."
Family means nobody gets left behind or forgotten.
"Morgues are found in hospitals, usually on the lowest floor or basement."
Countries sometimes take some of the money or goods involved trade between countries.
Electrons are a well-known example that are found in ordinary matter.
"Polyurethane is made of organic units, which are joined by urethane."
Variation is a also term used in biodiversity for the variety of life forms in a given ecosystem.
"Longitude is measured using degrees, the same way an angle is."
Genes are linked when they are on the same chromosome.
All scanners have special parts which are used to take a picture from an object.
Units of mass are used to measure the amount of matter in something.
"Stars shine and the light can be seen with a telescope, but they also give off radio waves."
"Common plants used in topiary include bay laurel, holly bushes, myrtle and privet hedges."
All magnets have what is called a magnetic north pole and what is called a magnetic south pole.
"Stickleback species are found in fresh water environments in Europe, Asia and North America."
Sticklebacks have strong separated spines in the dorsal fin.
Heavy lorries are used to carry deliveries and heavy loads.
Communities are divided up and separated with roads.
Many people think it is one of the most beautiful buildings ever built.
Spider monkeys are found in rainforests in southern Mexico to the northern part of South America.
Most species are considered weeds.
Some species are planted in gardens for their beauty and to attract butterflies.
Fish is sold to their inland neighbors in exchange for products of the interior.
Chemical formulas are used in chemical equations to describe chemical reactions.
"Bad karma is taught to be caused by pride, anger, greed, attachment and lust."
Words are written the same way but pronounced differently by different speakers.
Wild goldfish are called prussian carp and are silver-green in colour.
Fish learn to anticipate feedings provided they occur at around the same time every day.
Some people put salted fish or meat into 'gochujang'.
"Players can move only one 'mal' per each movement, unless 'mals' are grouped in one."
"Books are grouped by genres, writers, and prices."
Theorems are proved using logic and other theorems that have already been proved.
"Theorems are made of two parts, there are hypotheses and conclusions."
Points are calculated by the cards that players get.
"Many limestones contain fossils, and some are made up almost entirely of skeletal material."
Limestone is used to make glass and cement.
"Some algae are protists, if they are single-celled."
Locks are built in places where the level of the water in the river or canal suddenly changes.
Solid ingredients are eaten with chopsticks.
Chinese production is concentrated around Dalian.
Most people use granulated or liquid instant substitutes.
"Cities are spread far apart in the region, and it has the lowest population density of the country."
Rivers are used when possible.
"Cards are dealt in succession, and bets placed at each stage."
People say a country is 'landlocked' if it has no access to any oceans or seas.
"Shish kebabs are cooked or grilled on skewers, over hot coals or wood."
Rocks showing repeat patterns of strata are called rhythmites.
Some parks built in big cities are very large.
"All politicians have to argue, compromise, and make deals with each other to get things done."
Most people are called to prayer in Islamic countries as a daily part of life.
"Honey is an insect product made by bees, but it is kosher."
Ovaries are part of the reproductive system needed to reproduce sexually.
"Rhinoceros horns are used in Asian medicine, and for dagger handles in Yemen and Oman."
Engines can use pure ethanol or ethanol mixed with gasoline.
"Eukaryote cells have many different internal membranes and structures, called organelles."
Many cells take in food and other things using something called endocytosis.
Terrestrial species are adapted to survive extreme conditions.
Zooids carry prominent ciliated tentacles.
People often support without leaving a comment and that is tolerated.
"Many fruits are eaten animals, and the seeds are dropped after the fruit is digested."
Some fruits are carried on the fur of mammals.
Some species grow in large numbers as tiny weeds in the soil of gardens and cultivated fields.
Friends are people that can be looked up to and trusted.
Sayings are generalized.
Foster parents are paid by the state to look after the children.
Some societies have arrangements whereby children are brought up in other families.
Calves are exported to the United States of America.
Individual fruits are round to slightly flattened.
"Mitochondria also derive from symbiosis, but chloroplasts are found only in plants and protista."
Anthropologists believe that 'H. erectus' was the first human species to control fire.
"Intervals can be 'closed', 'open', or 'mixed'."
Endemic types are most likely to develop on islands because they are isolated.
"Actin filaments are shown in red, microtubules in green, and the nuclei are in blue."
Researchers believe that it is caused by a combination of biological and environmental factors.
Many people think that anorexia is caused by wanting to be thin like models in magazines.
Wooden spoons are used for mixing food.
Cast iron is iron made by the way described above in the article.
Iron compounds are used for several things.
Some iron compounds are used in vitamins.
Modern estimates are based on radioactive dating methods.
Animal realm is connected with ignorance.
Human realm is connected with desire and attachment.
Freedom of information is a human right recognised in international law.
Facts are handled sensibly.
Horses can accidentally step on a person who has fallen to the ground.
Rocks are made up of one or more minerals.
Gifted education is handled separately.
Dormancy is governed by changes inside the seed.
Sea spiders are found in all oceans.
"Wise spelunkers explore in groups, to prevent being lost or stranded in a cave."
All sand dollars have a rigid skeleton known as a 'test'.
Movement is done by the action of the spines.
Pottery is when clay used to model shapes and then fired in a kiln.
Rifles are made to shoot many different sizes of bullets and different amounts of gun powder.
Modern rifles are made for many different purposes.
Some exhibitions show things which can be bought.
"Firms exhibit the things they have made, hoping to encourage business."
Adults are colored green on their upperparts and breast.
Many people are said to have seen ball lightning.
Subduction is believed to work by density.
Tornadoes mostly happen during strong thunderstorms called supercell storms.
Magnets can make some other metals into magnets when they are rubbed together.
Dugongs are more closely related to elephants than to other sea creatures.
Elision is one or more sounds left out of a word.
Recorders are made in different sizes.
Groups often play music that is written for several different sizes of instrument.
Austrian nobility is granted Freedom of religion.
Primary pollutants are pollutants that are put directly into the air by humans or natural sources.
Many secondary pollutants are made when a primary pollutant reacts with sunlight.
Most air pollution made by humans today is because of transportation.
Air pollution becomes a worldwide problem when local pollution moves away from where it came from.
Acid rain can also damage buildings made of limestone and concrete.
"Pintos have pink skin, blue eyes, and white or multicolored hooves."
Native numbers are used for numbers one through ten.
Grebes make their nest from plants found in the water.
Body modification is done for different reasons.
"Notice chicks on mother's back, and small gift brought by the male."
Curds are used to make cheese.
"Oysters sometimes make pearls, which are valuable and used to make necklaces."
"Sponges are sessile, they live in one place, where they are 'fixed' to the ground."
Some species are thought to use either sticky threads or hooked spicules.
"Teams are awarded competition points for a win, but can also earn 'bonus' points."
Braille is used with different languages today.
"Braille uses cells of six raised dots, in two columns of three dots."
Fire ants attack in groups when disturbed.
Manna is described as being comparable to Hoarfrost in size.
German soldiers are sent to Finland.
Arthropods are made up of four groups of living animals and one group of extinct animals.
Computer engineers design and build computers and the parts that computers are made of.
Clients listed on a light purple background are no longer in active development.
Scale models are made or collected for many reasons.
Inorganic compounds are chemical compounds other than carbon-based.
Families often like to see the body once it has been removed from the machines and put to rest.
Some stadiums are paid to add a company name to the name of their stadium.
"Disasters can be of different kinds, but most are caused by forces of nature."
"Hops look like little cones, and are used to make beer."
Some concerts are given to very large audiences in the open air.
Palms are one of the most well-known and widely planted tree families.
"Article clean up needed, yes, but the subject is notable."
Adjustments are made by using what is known of the fossil record.
Bots are really just computer programs that their operators wrote to do something.
"Black shales are deposited in anoxic or low oxygen environments, such as in stagnant water columns."
"Biological control means using natural methods to get rid of pests, instead of using poisons."
Fishing lures can be very expensive as some are sold for thousands of dollars.
Ammonia also can make cleaning supplies which can be used on glass.
Celestial bronze is designed to wound immortals and monsters without injuring mortals.
Nobody knows when the game location was moved.
Tapers come in many sizes and are usually sold by the thickness of the large end.
Leavening agents produce gas that becomes trapped in the dough.
"Egg whites are used to help make a light, airy ."
Baked goods are sold at a bakery.
Poison gases are used in industry as chemical reagents.
Limits are used to see what happens very close to things.
"Locusts are edible insects, and are considered a delicacy in some countries."
Weight is a measure of the force on the object caused by a gravitational field.
"Weight is measured in newtons, the standard unit for force."
Smoke bombs are used to hide positions and objects from sight behind a thick cloud of smoke.
Baguettes are eaten as a sandwich cut in half.
"Weight training is a safe kind of exercise when the motion is slow, controlled, and careful."
Many exercise machines are made to be safe for use alone.
Adjectives get over-used and are often unhelpful and redundant.
"Dachshunds often have spinal problems, that is, their backbone can become injured."
Moves are called out in 'notation'.
Some special rules are required.
"Electronic clocks can also count the moves made, and apply the set time limits for a game."
Players are permitted to ask two kinds of question.
"Plans are formed, based on the position, and put into action."
"Openings have names, and extensive theory has been worked out by masters."
"Competitions are run by putting engines against each other, and the results are published."
Figurine notation is used in print and computer chess.
Propane is extracted from natural gasoline or from petroleum.
Anal sex can still pass sexually transmitted diseases from one partner to another.
"New theatres being built include restaurants, party rooms, conference rooms, arcades and more."
Litters are born in the early summer.
Octopods are the only invertebrate which has been conclusively shown to use tools.
Many insects use a sex determination system based on the number of sex chromosomes.
"Sounds are produced by  open strings, stopped strings, and harmonics."
"Players mainly learn popular well studied versions, often using a recording as a reference."
"People know where other people grew up, if they listen to their Ripuarian talk."
Trolleys are used in airports and some large railway stations for passengers to carry their luggage.
Pages are added automatically by using .
Much preparation is needed before they can move forward.
Mutants are herded into concentration camps and killed.
Urethral syndrome is related to urethritis.
ZIP codes are numbered with the first number representing a certain group of U.S. states.
Hostages are taken for many different reasons.
"Kidnapping is the act of taking a hostage and asking for a sum of money, called ransom."
Guitars are made and sold in many parts of the world by many companies.
Some guitar music is written in both musical note format and tablature.
Languages are compiled by a compiler.
Marks are made on a specially printed paper forms which are then read by an OMR reader.
Students mark their answers on specially printed sheets using either a pencil or a special marker.
"Plants grown here are maize, tomato, chilli, cauliflower, beans and other vegetables."
"Flintstones often have a rough lumpy surface but when they are broken, they look like dark glass."
Flintstones are used in some countries for building.
Characters are printed in a special font.
Many historians argue that it was a major reason that the Soviet Union fell apart.
"Classical music is written for solo trumpet, and trumpets are included in orchestras."
"Potassium is a common element found in many materials, such as micas, clay, tephra, and evaporites."
Diamondbacks are found from Florida to California.
Most computers use a system of binary which is composed of ones and zeros.
"Water is absorbed in the large intestine, leaving the waste."
Literal translation tries to be as close as possible to what is written in the original language.
Ionizing radiation works by damaging the DNA of exposed tissue thus killing it.
"Figures are drawn to scale, but the gibbon, on the left, is drawn at double size."
"Tables are extremely flexible, and can easily be constructed on computer and in print."
"Mature individuals are goblet-shaped, on relatively long stalks."
"Common ingredients are fruits, fruit juice, sugar, crushed ice, and ice cubes."
"Velvet is made, ideally, from silk."
"Nemerteans collect food with their proboscis, which is closely associated with the digestive system."
Some organs also have some pipes made of brass that sound like trumpets.
Many family members are grown as ornamental plants.
Some trainers allege that squats are associated with injuries to the lumbar spine and knees.
Some women are born without a hymen.
All services including dialysis and transplantation are provided free of charge.
Toy poodles are made to be one of the smartest dogs of all.
Poodles are bred in many different sizes.
Productivity is the amount of the produced goods divided by total working hours.
"Most chaetognaths are transparent and are torpedo shaped, but some deep-sea species are orange."
Some species are known to use the neurotoxin 'tetrodotoxin' to subdue their prey.
Chaetognaths appear to have originated in the Cambrian Period.
Turnstiles are used at a variety of places.
Rooms are hired out for events.
Average measurements are applied.
"Atoms are made up of protons, neutrons, and electrons."
Chemical symbols are used all over the world.
Sodium is a metal that burns when put into water and chlorine is a poisonous gas.
RAID is a term used in computing.
RAID is done by  using special hardware  or software on the computer.
Special calculations are done.
Data is split up into static sequences of bits.
Middle fibers are developed by pulling shoulder blades together.
Gonorrheal infections are associated with burning or sharp penis pains during ejaculation.
Doctor removes the source of pain when needed.
Heavy elements are needed to make living things.
People usually dance to disco music at bars called disco clubs.
Crustaceans are animals with hard shells made from many pieces for protection.
All articles are written from a conservative point of view dominant in the United States of America.
Discourse analysis is related to text linguistics.
"Tombs break open, and the curtain in the Temple is torn from top to bottom."
All courthouses are done at the county level.
Traits selected by mate choice are called 'ornaments'.
"Dung beetles eat dung of herbivores and omnivores, and prefer that produced by herbivores."
"Many species are wingless, or have reduced wings."
"Natural pearls are made by oysters accidentally, and are very rare."
Cultured pearls are made by tiny  being purposely put into the oysters to begin making pearls.
Some bins are used specifically for recycling.
Olive drab is one of the colors used for Sofia and camouflage in the military.
Songs are sung by playback singers which actors and actresses lip-sync on screen.
Some species are disguised as birds' droppings resting on a leaf.
Most volcanoes are explained by the collision or splitting apart of continental plates.
Most boxers have their tail cropped at birth.
"Gases trapped in clathrates are enclosed in ice, they look like packed snow."
Infrared lasers are used to provide the light for optical fiber communications systems.
"Tree rings grow under the bark, and the bark is pushed out while the tree is growing."
Tree rings are used to make radiocarbon dating more accurate.
Pillow lavas are used generally to show volcanism occurred underwater in metamorphic belts.
State governors are elected to office by popular vote.
Many people think it was the first alternative country album.
Most wildlife is concerned with the preservation and improvement of habitats.
Geysers are made in special geological conditions.
Different numbers are used by different stock markets.
People sometimes decide to get rid of clutter.
Organized storage includes keeping objects together based on what they do and where they are used.
"People put labels on boxes in the attic, for example."
Fans are turned on and windows are kept open while using cleaners with fumes.
People clean before a strong cleaner is needed.
People buy knowledgeable books on cleaning to look things up in as needed.
Cleaning tools are used in the best order to clean without wasting time.
Knowledgeable books tell what people have found out and invented.
Berserkers are banned in Norway.
Encyclopedias are written in the third person because they are supposed to give neutral facts.
Objectivity is acquired by the production of evidence and reasoning.
Coconut cream is made from the liquid that is on the surface of coconut milk.
G is the lowest note when all the holes are covered.
"Monocytes are attracted to a damaged site by chemical substances, triggered by a range of stimuli."
Granulocytes are released from the bone marrow.
Monocytes are produced by the bone marrow from stem cell precursors called 'monoblasts'.
Modern racetracks are designed with safety as the first priority.
Some race tracks are called road courses.
Spoken languages use sounds from the mouth and are understood with the ears.
Sign languages use hands and are understood with the eyes.
Some deaf people can also understand spoken words by looking at a speaker's lips.
"Some signs are made with only one hand, and others are made with both hands."
Some children are born deaf.
"Gloves are made of many different fabrics and materials, and gloves are used in many ways."
"People wear thick gloves, usually made of wool or fabric, to keep their hands warm in cold weather."
People also wear thin gloves made of rubber or plastic to keep things they touch clean.
Some workers wear gloves made of heavy rubber to protect their hands from chemicals.
"Gloves are worn in sports, the most common reason being for extra grip for the competitors hands."
Sand dunes are made when wind or a river pulls sand into a mountain-like shape.
Calcium chloride is melted at a high temperature and electrolyzed to produce calcium metal.
Matrix inversion is used extensively in computer graphics.
Potassium chloride is found as a mineral.
Potassium chloride is heated very hot until it melts.
Sodium metal is reacted with it.
Permanganates stain because they are easily reduced to brown-black manganese dioxide.
Substances are deprotonated by other substances more basic than themselves.
Potassium hydroxide is used as an electrolyte.
Calcium carbonate is very abundant and usually mined.
Many chlorates produce oxygen when they are heated.
Some sulfur is added.
Fossil footprints suggest it was a herbivore.
Some shops only sell entirely Potter-related merchandise.
"Ringer is a young taekwondo practitioner who was born and raised in Dallas, Texas."
Masks are used in many magical or shamanistic rituals in non-western societies.
Salts containing the sulfite ion are called sulfites.
"Body temperature is usual measured at the mouth, the armpit or the anus."
Winners are marked in 'bold' text.
"Winners are listed first, in 'bold'."
Silky sharks are considered dangerous to humans because of their aggressive nature and size.
"Phoronids are worm-shaped, but with a gut that loops and exits the body near the mouth."
Gametes are released through the nephridia.
Radioactive material is added to a container within the heater.
Vibration isolation is a branch of protective techniques known as vibration control.
Albums are listed in order of number of copies sold and by the artist's first name.
Many graptolite fossils resemble hieroglyphs written on the rock.
Cockatoos have black bills made of keratin.
Some slides are designed to act also as life rafts if the plane lands in the water.
Chemical compounds containing the phosphite ion are called phosphites.
Phosphoric acid is heated with a sodium halide to make the hydrogen halide and sodium phosphate.
Boobies are large birds with long pointed wings and bills.
Fear conditioning is when a previously neutral stimulus is used to elicit fear.
Instrumental conditioning is based off of a system of reward and punishment.
"Bull terriers have a short coat, small triangular eyes and an egg shaped head."
All underground platforms are accessed through ticket barriers.
All parameters are listed.
Small changes are shown as 'm'.
Amalgams are used in tooth fillings.
Bigger versions are sold in the streets as a snack.
Abrasives are used to make the ends of wood pieces smooth and to smooth the cut ends of metal.
Starlings are considered a nuisance species in North America.
Increased temperatures can lead to engine knock because of increased cylinder head temperatures.
Most manufacturers recommend more frequent oil changes for turbocharged engines.
Turmeric is also more widely used as a colourant for textiles and food products.
Ellipses are used often in everyday life as well as in literature.
Nitrites can form toxic chemicals when heated.
Nitric oxide is toxic when breathed in.
Amides made by deprotonating ammonia are very strong bases.
"Hydrochloric acid works the best, but sodium chloride can be used too."
Archaeologists study things left over from prehistory to try to understand what was happening.
All fields are optional and unused parameter names can be left blank or omitted.
Musicians still argue about which version ought to be played.
Potassium fluoride is made by reacting potassium carbonate with hydrofluoric acid.
"Zooids are very small, highly modified individuals."
Paint brushes are used by painters of all sorts.
Many artists are famous for their painted pictures.
"Paint is a very good way to give important information to people, using painted signs."
Quiet calls are made while feeding to keep contact with others in their social group.
Crows appear to have evolved in Asia from corvid stock which had evolved in Australia.
"Plaice are characterised by their smooth, brown skin, red spots and bony ridge behind the eyes."
Silver iodide is sprinkled in clouds to make rain.
"Some taboos are because a religious, legal or social authority did something, over and over."
"All flatfish are rather flat, and have ray-finned fish."
Resistors are used to limit the current when the motor starts.
"Quotation marks are used for multiple-paragraph quotations in some cases, especially in narratives."
Cheese is derived from milk.
"Many applications use text codes, which become replaced with a graphical emoticon."
Nests are built by the males and take about seven days to complete.
Some scientists think that narcolepsy is caused by a lack of hypocretin.
Footnotes are handled easily.
"Some birds range over a number of habitats, but many are found in only one environment."
Alluvial soils carried in the floodwaters add nutrients to the floodplains.
Many stories connected to Aboriginal rock are highly complex and linked to other stories.
Some minerals are tested by taste.
Eye shadow is a cosmetic that is applied on the eyelids and under the eyebrows.
Eye liner is a cosmetic used to define the eyes.
Growth cycles are controlled by a chemical signal like epidermal growth factor.
General elections are held at least once every three years.
Current machines feed from a sealed cartridge which is normally a proprietary design.
Teams are supplied with two different types of wet weather tyres.
Intermediate tyres are used when the track surface is damp or during a light rain.
Points are awarded to drivers and teams based on their finishing order.
Zinc sulfide is used to convert ultraviolet light to visible light.
Zinc carbonate makes zinc oxide when heated.
"Zinc oxide is used in the vulcanization of rubber, preventing the rubber from becoming brittle."
Zinc oxide is used in calamine.
Straight chassis are used for sprint racing.
Power is transmitted from the engine to the rear axle by way of a chain.
Slicks are used for dry weather.
Spiked tires are used for ice.
Barium oxide is made by heating barium carbonate with carbon.
Barium oxide is very toxic when eaten.
Barium hydroxide is used in titrations.
Barium carbonate is used to poison rats.
Chlorites are made by reacting chlorous acid with a base.
Sulfur can make explosive mixtures with potassium chlorate because chloric acid can be made.
Ammonium nitrate is made by reacting ammonia with nitric acid.
Ammonium nitrate is used as a fertilizer.
Chlorine dioxide is used to bleach wood pulp to make paper.
"Ammonium perchlorate is used more, though."
Designer labels on accessories are perceived as an indicator of social status.
"Some metals can boil and burst into flames when placed in thermite, such as zinc."
Historians think that Boulder City was named after Boulder Creek.
Semiconductors are used to make photocells.
Selenium dioxide is used in making organic compounds.
Selenium dioxide is used as a coloring in glass.
Selenic acid is made by oxidation of selenium dioxide with hydrogen peroxide.
Selenium sulfide is a poorly known chemical compound.
Lead needs to be expanded to adequately summarise the article.
Qualitative chemistry is used in many jobs.
Many reactions are used in qualitative chemistry.
Commander is a rank used in many navies and some air forces.
Sodium telluride is made by reacting tellurium and sodium in liquid ammonia.
Sodium telluride is used to make organic tellurium compounds.
Cadmium telluride is used to make electricity in solar cells.
"Rocket motors come in many different sizes, and they are indicated by a code on the motor."
Carbon is used in the reduction process.
All items bought from the catalogue appear here.
Most paleontologists believe that it was a carcharodontosaurid.
"Customers choose networks based on how well the different networks work in their area, or by price."
"Crumpets are toasted whole, while English muffins are split and then toasted."
Hybrid animals are called chimeras sometimes because of the monster.
Many military actions are called police actions.
Guard cells are activated by sunlight.
"Extra energy is needed, more than what is obvious by the temperature scale."
Smaller offices are called 'Police posts'.
Some prisoners are considered dangerous to other people in the prison.
White flour is preferred by many people.
Time is measured in mya along the x-axis.
Flotation is used to concentrate the ore.
Abstract art is found in painting and in sculpture.
Art based on geometry is a kind of geometric abstraction.
Versions designed for children come in great variety of puzzle piece sizes.
Potassium sulfide is made by reacting potassium with sulfur.
Historical mistakes are the reason that the movie was forbidden for the youth.
"Sodium phosphide is flammable, making toxic gases when burned."
"Time is measured in Ma, megaannum, along the x-axis."
"Time is measured in Ma, megaannum, along the x-axis."
"Time is measured in Ma, megaannum, along the x-axis."
More context is needed here for anyone to answer 'yes' or 'no'.
"Carbon dioxide is released when people burn fossil fuels, like oil, coal, and natural gas."
Bromic acid is made by adding a strong acid to a bromate such as sodium bromate.
"Most white people are of European origin, but are also found in other parts of the world."
Elections are held in the spring.
"Death is represented as a male, and life as a female."
"Oversight is simply follow the guidelines, and hide what needs to be hidden."
Iodic acid is used to make other iodates by reacting bases with iodic acid.
Photo editing is done for many reasons.
Some people appear to have broken bones.
Some people call it the novel that began the popularity of paperback books.
Some students say they actually went to the party.
Periodic acid is found as a colorless solution.
Iodine pentoxide is made by heating iodic acid to  in dry air.
Welded tuff is a pyroclastic flow of lava which was hot enough to weld together.
Basaltic tuffs are occur widely.
"Mesons are hadrons, which simply means that they are made of quarks."
Large objects are removed using screens.
Water is pumped over the rocks or plastic.
Halophiles are categorized by the levels of salt at which they grow best.
Halophiles also ferment salted fish.
Lifeboats are required by law to be on larger ships.
Baryons are part of a larger collection of subatomic compounds called Hadrons.
Hadrons are simply particles made of quarks.
"Protons are known as baryons, which means that they are made of exactly three quarks."
"Baryons are in a family called Hadrons, which simply means that they are made of quarks."
Electromagnets are used for a variety of purposes.
"Electromagnets are used in everyday items such as burglar alarms, electric relays and fire bells."
Notability means to be noted.
Black lines show some of the major faults that created the valley.
W bosons are named after the weak force that they are responsible for.
Weak force is believed to be able to change the flavour of a quark.
Mesons are a family of composite particles which are made of one quark and one antiquark.
Fishermen living in the area say the park management killed the fishermen on purpose.
Strange quarks have a property known as strangeness.
Muscles are attached to the top of the fibula which help move the knee.
"Antimony trioxide is found in two minerals, valentinite and senarmontite."
Antimony trioxide is made when antimony is made.
Antimony tetroxide is found as the mineral cervantite.
Antimony pentoxide is used in fire retardants and the making of titanium dioxide.
Arsenic trioxide is used to fight cancer.
Arsenic trioxide is highly toxic when eaten.
Arsenic pentoxide is used to make pesticides and insecticides.
Arsenic acid is used in the making of some dyes and organic arsenic compounds.
Potassium arsenate is made by reacting amounts of potassium hydroxide with arsenic acid.
Antiseptics make it less likely a wound gets infected.
Cars are banned from the big pedestrian zone which has plenty of shops.
Lets just make sure the mineral page here is updated and is correct.
Collisions are made from two smaller sections called elastic and inelastic collisions.
Detection probably comes from the fact that they are affected by gravity.
Milk substitutes have a similar look and taste to milk produced by the mammary glands of a mammal.
"Barnacles are suspension feeders, sweeping small food into their mouth with their curved 'feet'."
Baby blue is known as one of the pastel colors.
Hernias sometimes give pain and a lump that can be felt.
"Tourists can either walk around the area themselves, or go on a guided tours."
"Most species are terrestrial, but arboreal and semi-aquatic monitors are also known."
Copper is used extensively in electrical wiring and circuitry.
Stained glass is used in some kinds of art.
"Some people think that, in the stories, Chaucer was saying things about court politics."
Sweat is produced in apocrine sweat glands in the same way.
"Compound eyes are common in arthropods, and are also present in annelids and some bivalved molluscs."
Mobiles are a kind of sculpture where the pieces are moved by motors or the wind.
"Several awards are given to authors, editors and illustrators for creating works of science fiction."
Arms are grown within a short time of coming out of their egg.
Prizes are given for works from the year before the award is given.
"Teeth are set in sockets, but are known only in a few, small individuals."
"Food can make people sick if it is contaminated by microorganisms, bad metals, or chemicals."
"Many animal species walk on their toes, and are called 'digitigrade'."
Special chainsaws are used for cutting concrete.
Examples are included on the talk page.
Resistors are used to increase resistance in the circuit so it slows down the current.
Limousines are an expensive form of auto transport and are usually offered for rich citizens.
Domestic cats are found in shorthair and longhair breeds.
"Pregnant queens deliver their litters by themselves, guided by instinct."
Spoonbills generally prefer fresh water to salt but are found in both environments.
"Spoonbills are monogamous, but, so far as is known, only for one season at a time."
Chemical elements are made of atoms.
"People can be addicted to drugs, cigarettes, alcohol, gambling, caffeine, and many other things."
Engineers usually design or build things that are sold or given to people.
Computer engineers design and build computers and the parts that computers are made of.
"Some communication is done without thinking, such as by changing in posture."
"Antelope are found mostly in Africa below the Sahara, and parts of Asia."
Peat fires are used to dry malted barley for use in Scotch whisky distillation.
"Transformation occurs naturally in some species of bacteria, and can also be done artificially."
Inflammation is stimulated by chemical factors released by injured cells.
"Fermions have properties, such as charge and mass, which can be seen in everyday life."
Quarks are grouped into three pairs.
"Many grevilleas interbreed freely, and some specially picked hybrids have been grown for sale."
Specific terms are used to describe the sexual expression of individual plants within a population.
Wires are covered with insulators like plastic to stop the electricity from leaving the wire.
"Emergency shelters vary in policy on pet, companion, or domesticated animals."
"Volcanic islands are formed with no life, and all life has to arrive carried by wind or water."
Hybrid zones are regions where diverged populations meet and interbreed.
Psychokinesis is the word used to describe many different abilities.
Design patterns are used in object oriented programming.
Microbial mats grow mostly on submerged or moist surfaces but a few survive in deserts.
Nerves are surrounded by fatty cover of a substance called myelin.
White matter is used to connect different areas of grey matter.
Casual groups are called 'shoals'.
Foundations built for above-ground structures include shallow and deep foundations.
Many medicines contain parts made from benzene.
Festivals are celebrated there.
Regular sugar is used to sprinkle it.
Child labour is forbidden in most countries.
Children can also do it while they are well-integrated into the family.
Turkey denies that the event was genocide.
Turkish money is called liras or lire.
"Some cards come with the books, but card packs with more cards can be bought."
Notability just means that the thing is noted.
Many canyons are made by rivers and earthquakes.
Magic Kingdom is divided into six areas.
Mammals have a jawbone composed solely of the dentary.
"Some listeners claim that by reversing the song, a hidden Satanic message is revealed."
Eyespots are found in nearly all major animal groups.
"Felidae cats are well known for their grooming, which they usually do by licking themselves."
Freckle formation is triggered through exposure to sunlight.
Shoppers are given a broader range of products to choose from online.
"Flowers are most often blue in color, although pink flowers are sometimes examined."
Chromosomes are made up of DNA and protein combined as chromatin.
"Players can build a kingdom, through a quest-driven gameplay."
"Links show that the general notability guideline is fulfilled, which is an indication of notability."
"Warne is a very rural town, surrounded by wildlife, countryside, and national forests."
Modern dams are built with arched walls of steel rod-reinforced concrete.
"Medical diagnosis is the best-known field, but diagnosis can be applied to any subject."
"Items also move forward through time, which is sometimes called the fourth dimension."
"Some physicists think gravity is caused by gravitons, but they are still unsure."
Eggs are laid in water.
Infant attachment is found to some degree in all mammals and is greatly expanded in humans.
Cocaine is white and is made up of small crystals.
Most cocaine is used as an illegal drug.
Megapodes are a family of birds found in Australasia.
"Radio telescopes are like radio antennas, usually shaped like large dishes."
Different cultures have different orders for a person's family name and given name.
Historians still have no idea about the planning of the fire or who did it.
Lavender also is very helpful when applied to insect bites.
Scientists use rotary evaporators to remove the liquid a solid is dissolved in.
Pepper is one of the most common spices used around the world.
Christians believe the cost of being a disciple is worth the promised rewards.
Dogs are wolves modified by breeding.
Sterilisation often is done for a way of birth control.
"Pears have a core surrounded by yummy flesh, meaning pears are pomes."
Fruits are an evolutionary 'invention' which help seeds get dispersed by animals.
Cosmetics are also widely used in the world of acting.
Some people think that every single assertion in an article needs to be cited.
"Atoms are made up of electrons, neutrons, and protons."
Lemurs are found occupying more or less the same ecological niches as monkeys do in Africa.
Articles containing older statements are more likely to be dated.
All routes operate in both directions unless detailed.
Packed columns are created of fused silica or stainless steel.
People living in the town are crowded into a narrow area.
Codes are shown with their last year of use.
"Modern passwords are made of characters, letters and numbers."
Air is made of many gases that are mixed together.
Combustion is used in many ways.
"Igneous rock is hardened magma, which can happen above or below ground."
Sedimentary rock is compacted sediment which can come from any of the other rocks.
"Blood is pushed through the organism by the heart, and brings nutrients and oxygen to our tissues."
Blood cells are made in the bone marrow and in the spleen.
Plasma proteins are made mostly by the liver.
"Similar schemes exist outside London, run by each local authority."
"Weapons are scattered around the map, and perks and care packages assist the players."
Overtures usually have tunes which are going to be heard during the opera or ballet.
Gorillas are peaceful animals that live in family groups called troops.
Skin cancer is the most commonly diagnosed type of cancer.
Thiamine is needed to break down food such as glucose.
"Gestation lasts two months, and litters contain one or two well-developed young."
Hyraxes are well-furred rotund creatures with a short tail.
Many people believe that was censorship.
Bassets are used in hunting to detect the scent of game.
Prizes are given in twenty-one categories.
Diffraction is caused by one wave of light being shifted by a diffracting object.
"Diffraction gratings are used in many analytical chemistry tools, such as a spectrometer."
Ionization is the process by which neutral atoms are converted to charged species.
Most compounds break apart when they are ionized.
Attractive forces are based on polarity differences.
Pi electrons refer to a type of bond that occurs between electron orbitals called pi orbitals.
Icelandic people are considered to be the most happiest people on Earth.
Some drugs are sold only when the purchaser shows a medical prescription to the seller of medicines.
Spurges can be poisonous if swallowed.
Some helmets are made from metal.
Smallpox is caused by the related 'Variola virus'.
Human cases are very rare and most often contracted from domestic cats.
Handstands are known by various other names.
Balance is kept by shifting body weight towards the fingers or the heel of the hand.
Credits are taken from the album's liner notes.
Shipments are based on certifications.
Credits are taken from the album's liner notes.
All tonal music is based on a major or minor scale.
Entertainers are listed under their place of birth or where they grew up.
"Toucans are known for their huge beaks, which can grow larger than their bodies."
Many species are grown for their ornamental flowers.
Many species are adapted to alpine climates.
All matter is formed of atoms.
Some visual bands are effected by X japan.
Horses have to be trained to accept a bridle or a saddle.
Cratons are subdivided geographically into geologic 'provinces'.
Some verbenas are considered weeds.
Some psychologists think it can be caused by a hormone imbalance.
Stars are made in nebulas.
Rumble strips are raised lines placed horizontally on a road.
Many visitors come here every year and many artists have painted the islands.
Impression management is an idea spoken about in the discipline of sociology.
"Air is sent through a pipe that makes sound, like the cries of the victim."
"Trustees are elected to serve four-year terms, with a maximum limit of three terms."
Photos show the roof of the building completely submerged at the height of the tsunami.
"Constitutional isomers have the same atoms, but they are joined differently."
Communities are also divided into populations.
Macaques are found in Japan.
Chemists study symmetry to explain how crystals are made up and how chemicals react.
Spectroscopic notation is based on facts taken from molecular symmetry.
Hydrogens are omitted in the third example for clarity.
"Blue sharks are found worldwide, in temperate and tropical waters."
Blue sharks are known to migrate thousands of miles for food and for mating.
Compensation can hide real or imagined problems and personal or physical inferiority.
"Conjugated systems are created by several multiple bonds, each separated by single bonds."
Cyclic compounds can be partly or completely conjugated.
Conjugated systems have special properties that give their compounds strong colors.
Conjugated systems are the main things that make up chromophores.
Conjugated chromophores are found in the photoreceptors of the eye.
"Examples are conjugated carbonyl compounds conjugated dienes, and polyenes."
"Nurse sharks are nocturnal, and are very sluggish and are harmless unless bothered."
Nurse sharks have the simplest type of tooth arrangement found in sharks.
"Spiny dogfish are benthopelagic, meaning that they are found just above the bottom of the ocean."
Fish are in danger of being eaten if they are separated from the school.
Articles are permitted in userspace for some time before deletion is considered.
Required parameters are displayed in orange.
Required parameters are displayed in orange.
"Some radiators are used to cool things, such as a car engine."
Heat is moved from the engine to the liquid.
Many houses are located in areas that get cold.
Heat needs to be added to the house so the people are comfortable.
Bats eat mealworms if thrown up by the experimenter.
"Cuttlefish squirt out a cloud of black ink, turn pale and swim fast away from the ink."
Prehistory means history of a time before any written record.
Most calls have a rhythm of two repeated sounds.
Some models are sold in Japanese domestic market.
"Plovers are found throughout the world, and have short bills."
All text following a space is taken as the text to use for the link.
"People drink it mixed with water, over ice, in cocktails, or straight."
Rotaviruses infect the cells that the small intestine is made from.
Some historians believe that they mixed up fully with the Indian people of that time.
Colonial period means the period during which Western countries ruled India.
Some economists think it was a mixed economy.
Many churches have windows made of colored glass.
"Some torts cause damage to property, like a broken window."
Different laws are found in civil law countries such as France or Germany.
"Muslim custom varies by country, but boys can be circumcised at any time before puberty."
Whales have a thick layer of fat under their skin called blubber.
Coast lakes are former bays that have been cut off from the sea.
"Plants take the sun's energy, and they are eaten by other animals as food."
Historians believe the pagans first used the scallop shell as a symbol of fertility.
All waste is collected in tanks which are emptied on the ground by special toilet waste vehicles.
Many species are bought and sold.
"Cosmic dust is split into further types of dust, based on the dust's location."
Rocket candy is made of three different parts.
Rocket candy is made in different ways.
Rocket candy is made of three main parts.
Some extra chemicals make the rocket look better when it is launched.
Some extra chemicals are used to change the way the fuel feels and acts.
Carbon is found in charcoal or graphite.
Titanium makes the rocket make sparks and flames when it is launched.
Information is broken up into tiny pieces called 'bits'.
Porn stars needs to be renamed.
None is needed here at all.
All editors are reminded to be civil.
Article is promoted.
Many people say they have seen or heard ghosts.
Many people believe they have seen ghosts.
Some ghosts are said to be friendly and help people who have problems.
"Ghosts are said to form right after they die, or even centuries later."
Cuckoo is a house made of bricks.
Polymers are formed by polymerization of monomers.
Many reactions require some form of work-up procedure before the final product is isolated.
Chemists have many strategies to find the best sequence of reactions to make the desired product.
Organic molecules can have a higher level of complexity compared to inorganic compounds.
Many people believe that all marks or stains can be removed by dry cleaning.
Most glasses contain a metal oxide fused with silica.
Composite materials are structured materials composed of two or more macroscopic phases.
More sophisticated approaches are used in the determination of trace metals and organic compounds.
"Signature songs can be songs that helped boost an artists fan base, popularity, fame, and bookings."
Senators are limited to two terms.
Specific impulse is a measure of the force based on how much fuel there is.
Black powder is used in model rocket motors because it costs less.
Many chemical compounds are aromatic rings with other things attached.
Rhodesian giraffes have star or leafy shaped spots that extend to their leg.
"Linear algebra talks about functions, which are often called transformations."
Any article is selected and random.
Electric rays are found from shallow coastal waters down to at least  depth.
Chemists often melt the reactants together and then later anneal the solidified melt.
Electrons are forbidden from other energy levels.
Diseases are spread by infection.
"Pasteurization is used to kill microscopic organisms in liquids like milk, wine, and beer."
Most people working in banks and other government owned places get the day off.
Individual awards are given to players.
Pages here are tagged with the template .
Death also increases any value of all items that belonged to the pop icon.
Many fans disapprove of their actions and made public announcements.
Dormancy tends to be closely associated with environmental conditions.
"Different seeds have different habits, no doubt adapted to their habitat."
Growth is triggered by particular events in the environment.
Members are chosen from the wards of the city.
All available parameters are shown here.
Most nuclear reactors are used to make electricity.
Some reactors are used for other purposes.
All elements are made up uniquely of their own atoms.
Any physical differences are because of how the atoms are joined together.
Fungi are put into groups by the way they reproduce.
Grids are meant to be flexible.
"Orcas can be dangerous, and have been known to kill their attendants on rare occasions."
"Genes are regulated at either the transcriptional stage, or later, before translation."
Snails are found all over the world.
Snails are gastropods with a coiled shell large enough for the animal can retract inside it.
"Gun powder is packed into metal cylinders behind the bullet, called the cartridge."
"Cultural icons are often timeless, imprinted in our consciousness."
Plants use several strategies to defend against damage caused by herbivores.
Hardwoods normally have broad leaves and come from deciduous or broad-leafed evergreen trees.
Hardwood has xylem vessels which are used to transport water.
Softwoods have a vascular structure which looks similar to a bunch of drinking straws held together.
Furniture made by hardwood joinery is more expensive than that made from softwoods.
Nobody really knows why they wanted to move.
Many alcoholic beverages are gluten free.
Grain is used to produce the highest grade vodka.
Pure water is added to lower the alcohol contents to desired.
"Vodka is either drunk pure, or cocktails are made with it."
Offspring is made by a sperm fertilising an ovum from the female.
Different steps are involved in the process.
Many famous guitarists are known for their solo work.
Tax is how government is paid for in most countries.
Missiles are used in war to destroy military targets.
Red foxes are an important cause of mortality in newly fledged young.
"Trench foot is caused by standing on wet, muddy ground for a long time."
Receipts are used to show or prove that someone has got or received something.
"Valid values are 'left', 'right', 'top', or 'bottom'."
"Shooting is used for hunting birds such as grouse or pheasant, rabbits etc."
"Lever locks are considered difficult, although possible, to pick and also require a special pick."
Various tools are used for an exercise of the swimming.
Influence is concerned about.
SAWs are light enough to be used by one man.
New blocks made today can fit with old blocks made years ago.
"Geometry starts with a few simple ideas that are thought to be true, called axioms."
Movement is done by using the metal teeth.
Sovereign states are shown in 'bold' text.
Regions are used as a basic framework for description and comparison.
Races are divided into several groups based on how long they are.
Trackable items are logged on the website and moved from cache to cache.
"People use domesticated animals as livestock, that means for food, clothing, and work."
Computers then identify the drivers and mail enforcement letters to collect the missed tolls.
Stress analysis is about finding out how much stress causes deformation in a given material.
Gene ontology puts the data into groups based on genes.
Time locks are used in banks.
Nothing is lost by doing so since the history is available.
China is a society which has had a very long history.
Game servers are called shards.
Lightning is a large electrical  that happens between two opposite charged surfaces.
Visitors can look over here how people lived and what traditions they had.
All network models are based on the same principle.
"People can now visit a replica, built from the original plans and on the original foundation."
Inflammation happens in the body whenever an injury or illness is detected.
Nothing stops it being introduced when there is hard evidence.
"Carbon dioxide is produced from heating, driving and consuming products."
Some crowbars have a notched an end for removing nails.
Small objects have a large surface area compared to the volume.
Babies live very close to their mothers so that they can be kept warm.
"Dress pants are made of wool or polyester, and they are ironed before they are worn."
Social status is seen as a single line that goes from most primitive to most civilized.
Most properties are measured using a number and a unit of measurement.
Some jewelers are trained gemologists and are qualified to identify and evaluate gems.
Sesame oil can go bad if it is exposed to air and sunlight.
Chemical derivatives generate wastes that can be avoided.
Atmospheric pressure is measured in hPa.
"Evolutionary patterns are found that relate to the mass, age and composition of the star."
Most trees begin to bud two years after they are planted.
Verdins occasionally try to get tidbits of dried sugar water from hummingbird feeders.
"Ice storms are known to cause accidents, take power lines down and cause serious damage."
"Most daruma dolls are made of papier mache, and weighted at the bottom so the doll stands."
Dolls are sold without the eyes painted in.
All men are created equal.
"Direct proofs are used in mathematics, logic, and computer science."
Many single syllables are used by the Vietnamese language.
Articles containing older statements are more likely to be dated.
"Black tea is the national drink, and is drunk after food is eaten."
Gardening is related to farming.
Gardening is done just to produce fruit or vegetables for the gardener's own family.
Pages below are sorted according to the type of error.
Storms are studied by scientists called meteorologists.
Pressure is also related to density.
Rites of passage are ordered into three phases.
All services are given by private sector workers.
All districts are served by the system of integrated urban transport.
Proposals are reviewed by others.
Electrons traversing the periodic magnet structure are forced to undergo oscillations.
Diffraction prevents scientists from creating a perfectly collimated beam with no divergence.
Some people say that collimated light is focused at infinity.
Article is very short and does a bad job compared to the United States article.
Some critics say that Buddhist followers and leaders have been interested in property and money.
Beats can help measure tempos and are performed in grooves and rhythmic music.
Electrons are injected into a linear accelerator.
Most books are published in English and French.
Personalities are people that are just known for being on programs.
Parameters are specified in pairs.
Patterns caused by annual changes are called 'varves'.
Different organisms have cyst walls made of different things.
"Some species are used to make special oil, perfumes or incense."
Maximum pull exerted on the ring by the surface is measured.
All records pertaining to living members are closed to historians.
Software testing is meant to see how the software works under different conditions.
Management accounting is an applied discipline used in various industries.
Derived units are created by combining the base units.
Prefixes are added to the beginning of the unit to make a new unit.
Food coloring is used to match the color of a cheese product.
Flavour enhancers are added.
Interviews are given only grudgingly.
Organisms are pyritized when they are in marine sediments saturated with iron sulfides.
Roses belong to the family of plants called Rosaceae.
Pumpkins are spheres or stretched-out spheres.
Gross tonnage is a dimensionless index calculated with a mathematical formula.
Most airplanes are fixed wing.
Most airport terminals are built in a plain style.
"Some airports use a semicircular terminal, with aircraft parked on one side and cars on the other."
All terminals have bicycle racks and are also easily reached by foot from nearby areas.
People can learn about the past by talking to people who remember things that happened in the past.
"Density altitude is affected by barometric pressure, humidity and temperature."
Elders are considered to be wise because they have had much experience in their long lives.
Many persons still believe that the situation still continues to be worse compared to earlier times.
Protocols are set of rules.
Catatonia is known to happen sometimes with a few different mental disorders.
Apostatic selection is the term used when the different forms are genetic morphs.
Teams are given up to four clues.
Standards are important so that correct comparisons can be produced.
New species are discovered in New Guinea with each botanical survey.
"Verbs are a bit trickier, but the infinitive plus basic tenses are included."
People often discuss what the art critic has said or written.
"Furniture is made of wood, particle boards, leather, screws etc."
Bears often form clubs modeled on biker clubs.
Clubs are formed for bears to hang out with their own kind.
Gold can mean that something or someone is very good or has done very well.
Alluvial gold is gold that is found above the ground.
Rhythms can have different patterns which can be clapped or tapped.
Cultural inheritance is called legacy.
Characters now perform different moves based on their opponent's current physical state.
Antibiotics are used to treat simple cases of urinary tract infections.
Several dances are performed by various ladies of the court.
More boys are affected than girls.
Some larger mortars have a firing pin that is set off by using a string instead of automatically.
Heavier mortars are fired by three to five men.
"Most mortars used today are made up of a barrel, a plate for the barrel to stand on, and a bipod."
Mortars can be very helpful if they are used in hidden places.
"Rapier defends against fixed-wing aircraft, helicopters, unmanned aircraft and cruise missiles."
Ion cannons are used in many  science-fiction movies and television series.
Mountain guns are infantry guns designed for use during mountain combat.
Waves are found everywhere in the natural world.
Waves have properties that can be measured.
Classes are taught only in English.
Woodwind instruments are played in a variety of ways.
Winners are decided by the distance they get through the pit.
Some varieties are frosted.
Cytokinins are hormones in plants that are found both naturally and synthetically.
Taps usually have a handle that can be turned to start or stop the liquid coming out.
Many taps give water and are used in homes.
Many plants are associated with ancestral beings.
Laws also protect traditional designs from being copied.
Smaller areas are marked out.
Some brown algae are gathered by humans for food.
Red colour is sign of well done.
Some plants are used in gardens or parks.
Truck drivers are called 'truckers'.
"Many brittle stars are more fragile than starfish, which is how they got their name."
Power is supplied by three large generators.
Bivalves have two shells or valves connected by a hinge.
Corners are a type of defensive back often assigned to cover wide receivers.
"Investigation is done by a 'sialogram', which is a radiocontrast study of a salivary duct."
New series are highlighted in 'bold'.
Felsic magma is thick and has lots of a mineral called silica.
New series are highlighted in 'bold'.
Some families are pulled out of bed very early by children who want to open their presents.
"People write on paper, and books are made of paper."
Paper is produced in large factories called 'paper mills'.
Paper is used for writing and printing.
Aboriginal stories say a great fire came from the ocean.
"Joints usually occur as sets, with each set made up of joints that are parallel to each other."
Some historians say the Carolingian Empire was the start of the Holy Roman Empire.
Power is measured in watts.
Giraffes are found in parts of Africa.
Giraffes have horns called ossicones.
Some species are used for building shelters.
Tight ends are stronger than normal receivers and therefore are often called to block.
All illustrations are related to the article.
Programming blocks are groups of television programs that are played one after the other.
Big balloons are made from fabric.
Balloons are used for many purposes.
Most small balloons are made for parties.
Big balloons are used for people to fly into the sky.
Big balloons are called aircraft.
"Pontoon bridges are usually temporary structures, but some are used for long periods."
Extratropical cyclones are created by inflow focused along their cold front and warm fronts.
Deists believe that a higher power created the world.
"Winners are listed first in colored row, followed by the other nominees."
Medication is said to have a narrow or wide therapeutic index.
Eggs laid by snakes generally have leathery shells which often adhere to one another.
"Pesticides are used to kill pests, but many are bad for human health."
Air is moved from the outside through the respiratory system into the lungs.
Boric acid is used as a disinfectant.
Most holidays are observed by both the public and private sectors.
Cranberry plants are found in acidic bogs in cooler areas of the northern hemisphere.
Teamwork is created measurable results.
"X is also a commune in France, and there is a company called X in the United States."
Tributaries are indented under each larger stream's name.
Nothing is forbidden in an explanation.
Users are tested by multiple choice and type-in tests.
Tributaries are indented under each larger stream's name.
Tributaries are indented under each larger stream's name.
Tributaries are indented under each larger stream's name.
Tributaries are indented under each larger stream's name.
Tributaries are indented under each larger stream's name.
"Telomeres are destroyed during cell division, and are remade by the enzyme telomerase."
Tributaries are indented under each larger stream's name.
Tributaries are indented under each larger stream's name.
Tributaries are indented under each larger stream's name.
Tributaries are listed under the parent stream.
Rivers flowing into other rivers are listed by the rivers they flow into.
Tributaries are indented under each larger stream's name.
Gold foil is a type of foil which is gold coloured and stops heat from going anywhere.
Tributaries are indented under each larger stream's name.
Tributaries are indented under each larger stream's name.
Tributaries are indented under each larger stream's name.
Tributaries are indented under each larger stream's name.
Tributaries are indented under each larger stream's name.
Tributaries are indented under each larger stream's name.
Tributaries are indented under each larger stream's name.
Tributaries are indented under each larger stream's name.
All fields are optional and unused parameter names can be left blank or omitted.
Group homes are open to people when they are released from a psychiatric hospital.
Categories are placed before the last section header.
Tributaries are indented under each larger stream's name.
Tributaries are indented under each larger stream's name.
Most croup is caused by a virus infection.
"Children often are given steroids, but epinephrine is used in severe cases."
Tributaries are indented under each larger stream's name.
Alternate names are given in parenthesis.
Tributaries are indented under each larger stream's name.
Tributaries are indented under each larger stream's name.
Tributaries are indented under each larger stream's name.
"Rivers are listed in clockwise order, starting at the north end of the island."
"Rivers are listed in clockwise order, starting at the north end of the island."
Rivers flowing into other rivers are listed by the rivers they flow into.
Tributaries are indented under each larger stream's name.
Tributaries are listed under the river into which they flow.
Tributaries are indented under each larger stream's name.
Tributaries are indented under each larger stream's name.
Tributaries are indented under each larger stream's name.
Tributaries are indented under each larger stream's name.
Tap shoes are equipped with metal taps on the bottom of the shoe to make a sound.
Fermentation is used when making dairy products.
Milk contains a chemical called lactose.
Babies make an enzyme called lactase inside their bodies.
"Soy milk is similar to animal milk, but it is made from soybeans."
References are to be included in their respective section footnotes field.
"Sugar is washed, and treated with concentrated syrup."
"Blood tests are used more often, because they are easier to do."
Different tests have to be used to figure out that a person has neurosyphilis.
"Recent research indicates that large nuclei are deformed, causing magic numbers to shift."
Bad nutrition is a more marked problem of teenagers in developed countries.
Visual information is formed in such a way that it produces a message.
Some animals keep the zygote in their bodies until it is a full-grown baby.
Senators are elected by direct election on a provincial basis.
"Hummingbirds help flowers to pollinate, though most insects are best known for doing so."
Conscription is introduced in Athens.
Young men are required to perform duties which are part military and part civic.
Senators are elected for a term that is usually six years.
Many spoken languages have no written form.
Spoken language is much richer than written language.
Spoken language can have different rules than written language.
Butters always gets grounded.
People play the games by moving seeds on a board with pits carved in it.
Many different languages are spoken in Kenya.
Margins of error occur when a population is incompletely sampled.
Synecdoche is a thing or concept which is indirectly named.
"Bullets are basically non-explosive bits of metal, as opposed to shells, which explode upon impact."
Firearms known as 'revolvers' have a cylinder with holes that the bullets are loaded into.
Most firearms are designed to shoot at people.
Guns are the main weapons used by armies.
"Many operas are performed there, including modern operas."
Ships are let to sail on it.
Ownership also extends to the airspace over and seabed below.
"Icebergs are very dangerous to ships, and many ships have sunk after crashing into icebergs."
Headlands are made of hard rock and bays are made of soft rock.
Scientific models are used as a basis for scientific work.
Continental glaciers are glaciers that spread out over a large area of land.
Matches are based on age and weight.
"Some people get pains in their head occasionally, known as headaches."
Senators are appointed.
Elections are held in every fourth year.
Some bug sprays are sprayed at the bug to kill it.
Potentiometers are resistors where the resistance can be changed using a knob or a slider.
Combs are used in the making of thread from fibers like wool or cotton.
People wear a wide belt called an 'obi' with their kimono.
"Rectifiers are made of metals like copper, iron, and silver."
"Culture is seen in people's writing, religion, music, clothes, cooking, and in what they do."
Some people think it was suicide or murder.
"Later versions use light or diluted kefir, vinegar, mineral water, or even beer instead of kvass."
People do the tea ceremony in a special tea room or a special building called a 'cha-shitsu'.
Adults have round oval-shaped bodies covered in scales or setae.
Guyots show evidence of having been above the surface at one time.
Barren Island is the only presently active volcano associated with the Indian subcontinent.
Most movies are made so that they can be shown on big screens at cinemas or movie theatres.
Later movies are shown on television stations.
"Blood cancer is caused by malignancy that attacks the blood, lymphatic system, or bone marrow."
"Chloroacetic acid is used in industrial chemical processes, for example in the production of dyes."
Homologous traits are separated from traits that are analogous.
Atomic nuclei are protons and neutrons held together by the strong nuclear force.
Food is chewed by the teeth.
"Food is swallowed, which means it goes through the oesophagus."
Water is taken away from it.
Winners are listed first and highlighted in 'bold'.
Blood is centrifuged to remove cellular components.
Foreigners can also be 'naturalized' as citizens.
"Elephants are related to sea cows, which are large aquatic mammals."
White elephants are considered holy in Thailand.
"Player can find tank in different place by searching, bought by money or made by NPCs."
All albums made in France in the past year are able to win.
Regular taxa are supposed to be monophyletic.
Species are called 'antelopes' if they look like one.
"Light always travels at the same speed, and is affected by gravity."
Stars die when they run out of hydrogen or other nuclear fuel to burn and iron is produced.
Most boats are made to fit only one person.
Periods are used for decimals.
Most pagodas are built for religious purposes.
Carbon dioxide is used in the light-independent reactions.
French pralines are a combination of almonds and caramelized sugar.
"Fleas are considered parasites, and they drink the blood of the animal they bite."
"Some houses have more than one bedroom, and the biggest one is called a 'master bedroom'."
School education is given equally in both Italian and French.
Effective warning requires the coordinated use of multiple channels of communication.
Trappist breweries use different names for the different beers produced.
Some drinkers prefer the taste when the beers have been stored for several years.
State capitals are shown in boldface.
State capitals are shown in boldface.
Quarks are also nucleons if they are found inside a proton or neutron.
Larger ones are grown to feed livestock.
Much latin music is accompanied by song in Spanish.
Many famous people are buried in the church.
Nothing is damaged.
Common names are used by people to describe something.
Females are said to be larger than males.
Meter sticks are marked off in parts of a meter.
Decimals are formed by marking off a ruler in ten equal parts.
Fractions are used when there are parts of a whole number.
Many amphibians are a popular exotic pet and are found in pet stores that sell reptiles.
"Fossils are known from the larval stage, metamorphosis, and maturity."
Access is leased to foreign militaries and private companies for their own testing of weapons.
Every death is caused by evil spirits or spells.
Article shows editing patterns often used by spambots.
Sirens are found only in the southeastern United States and northern Mexico.
People are born with a certain religion.
Type sites are often the first or foundational site discovered about the culture they represent.
"Most stingrays have one or more barbed stings on the tail, which is used 'only' for self-defense."
"Tarantula hawks are found in India, southeast Asia, Africa, Australia and the Americas."
Solar flares are powered by the sudden release of magnetic energy that is stored in the corona.
Many extrasolar planets are known to move in highly elliptical orbits.
Levels are reduced in people with schizophrenia.
Visibility depends on the class used.
"Plants take in water through their roots, which are found underground."
Chocolate cakes are a sold in shops as well as made at home.
Phycology is also the study of prokaryotic forms known as blue-green algae or cyanobacteria.
Larger items are grabbed with the jaws.
Hair is made of keratin.
Hair color is passed down by parents only.
"Body hair is limited in women, and thicker in men."
Some species are kept as pets.
"Many species have smooth, brightly patterned, skin that almost looks enameled."
Chimaeras are formed from at least two fertilized eggs or early embryos fused together.
Pups are weaned after one month.
Pyres are built outdoors.
Red squirrels are protected in most of Europe.
Bigger cities are written in larger letters.
"Winners are listed first in 'bold', followed by the other nominees."
"Winners are listed first in 'bold', followed by the other nominees."
"Winners are listed first in 'bold', followed by the other nominees."
Winners are listed first.
"Crops grown include beans and corn, as well as rice."
Cultural homes can have a center or living quarters attached.
Every division is described so that a committee can manage it.
Containers are built to standardized sizes.
Ports round the world have been adapted to freight transport by container.
Public programs are offered in the summer.
Many airports have buildings which are used to hold airplanes and passengers.
True owls are found on every continent except Antarctica.
Ground sharks have a special membrane which protects their eyes when needed.
"Ground sharks are found in open oceans, seas, estuaries, and brackish waters."
Pups are born on small drifting ice floes in shallow waters.
"Chalkboards can be black or dark green, also called blackboards and greenboards."
Wood is considered one of the worst movie directors of all time.
Sideline reporters are reporters who are put in different spots around the venue.
"Dogs are used by humans for many different things, for work and as pets."
"Dogs eat both meat and vegetables, often mixed together and sold in stores as dog food."
"Some people are called blind, even though they can see a little bit."
"People can become blind because of diseases or accidents, but sometimes people are born blind."
People often confuse sheet music with printed music.
Some sources also claim that the German colonial army systematically poisoned desert wells.
Males go to the land only when the ice is gone.
Beaches are associated with summer in Western culture.
Young ones grow slowly compared to other sharks.
Hammerhead sharks are the most commonly caught sharks for finning.
Competence is required' as well.
Intrinsic factor is made by cells in the stomach.
Digital circuits are used for signals that repeatedly turn on and off.
Polarized sunglasses stop photons swinging up and down from passing.
Attenuated virus is a much less harmful strain of the same virus.
Several diseases are believed to result from  misfolded proteins.
"Tapirs have hoofed toes, with four toes on the front feet and three toes on the hind feet."
Antibiotics are prescribed to boost the body's natural defences.
Experts believe that one third of the world population is infected with 'M. tuberculosis'.
Earthquakes caused by subduction can lead to tsunamis.
Aldehydes have a carbon double bonded to an oxygen.
Many aldehydes are found in essential oils and are the reason for their smells.
Some people also get darkened patches of skin.
"Incubation times are long compared to other birds, as are fledgling periods."
Supplies are delivered once per week and mail is delivered twice per week.
Water comes from bores and is stored in tanks.
Water is stored in tanks and comes from two bores.
Supplies are delivered every two weeks.
Water is provided from four bores and placed in storage tanks for pumping to the community.
Mail is delivered once per week by air.
Water comes from two bores and placed in storage tanks for pumping to the community.
"Supplies are delivered once every two weeks, and mail is delivered once per week."
Armed robberies are reported in the western districts of Kabul.
Organized crime is a part of the Armenian economy.
Members are guided by the underworld laws brought from Russian prisons.
Women are trafficked from Bhutan to other countries for commercial sexual exploitation.
Alcohol consumption is the most serious addiction related problem in the nation.
Basal metabolism is usually by far the largest component of total energy used.
Estimates suggest that it was  in length.
Nothing is lost by deleting the stub and maybe replacing with a redirect.
Senators are placed in different classes.
Some templates automatically place the page where it is used into a category.
"Common colors are orange and red, but white, brown, and pink are also seen."
Nerve swelling and compression in the narrow bone canal are thought to stop the nerve from working.
Earth looks blue when seen from outer space by astronauts.
Zinc fingers are labeled blue and the zinc ion is labeled green.
Genetics research looks at mutated animal subjects to find out what the particular gene does.
Cells fix broken DNA strands on their own using DNA repair.
"Many foods can trigger anaphylaxis, even when the food is eaten for the first time."
"Blood pressure is written with the highest pressure first, followed by the lowest pressure."
Secondary hypertension means that the hypertension is caused by another disease.
Hypertension is diagnosed when the patient has persistently high blood pressure.
"Lifestyle changes are recommended to lower blood pressure, before starting drug therapy."
Size can vary and needs to be specified.
Size can vary and needs to be specified.
Birds are found on every continent of the world.
Some birds are scavengers and eat the bodies of creatures that have died.
Swans are mated for life.
"Some birds are mated for life, like married couples."
Most male birds have no sex organs that can be seen.
"Most birds stay together for the whole nesting season, and one advantage is that the work is shared."
Flocks of birds can be very highly organised in a way that takes care of all the flock members.
Palaeontologists now agree that birds evolved from Maniraptora group of dinosaurs.
Some birds are eaten as food.
Links are encouraged.
Maternity care is given to pregnant women to take care of their children.
Idioms are made of normal words that have a special meaning known by almost everyone.
Freedom of speech is thought to also include Freedom of information.
Plaques are put on to buildings to commemorate their links with important people or events.
Bananas are classified either as dessert bananas or as green cooking bananas.
Marina is classed as a New Wave artist by critics.
"Nobody knows what happened to the fort, or where exactly it was."
Colors are retained from the old edit count templates.
All countries are included in subcategories.
"Many polonaises are composed in what is called ternary form, or song form, or minuet and trio."
Some lithium compounds are used to make soap and grease.
"Beryllium combines with aluminium, silicon and oxygen to make a mineral called beryl."
Dives used for scuba diving are relatively simplistic.
Sills are fed by dykes as they form from a lower magma source.
Air is taken in through openings on the sides of the abdomen called spiracles.
Some insects have what is called 'incomplete metamorphosis'.
People often use poisons called insecticides to kill pest insects.
Money is needed to build and operate a public transit system.
Benzoic acid is extracted from an organic compound.
"Solvent extraction is used in the processing of perfumes, vegetable oil, or biodiesel."
Test matches are the top international matches played between countries.
Slogans vary from the written and the visual to the chanted and the vulgar.
Posthumous receipt is denoted by an asterisk.
Language starts as a tool external to the child used for social interaction.
External speech is the process of turning thought into words.
Many people believe that Iraq used chemical weapons against Kurdish people.
More examples are given in the test cases.
Alpine skiing is played in the Olympics.
"Ink is used in pens, in some computer printers, and in printing presses."
Special controllers are attached to the console to control the game.
Elections are done between the main person and the opposition.
People work to their strengths and both types of editors are needed.
Flag football is a game played with no padding.
"Chairlifts are found in skiing resorts, where they make skiers go up the mountain."
Beavers are known for building and keeping dams in rivers.
"Intermediates are found at minimum points of energy, and they can live for a very long time."
Scientists believe that intelligence can be measured or tested.
Retail banking is services provided to small businesses or individuals.
Conifers are wind-pollinated.
Pollination syndrome is the set of adaptive traits which help flowers to get pollinated.
Research depends upon the earliest printed copies.
Some pieces are believed missing.
Dimension stone is stone that has been selected and cut to specific shapes or sizes.
Carboxylic acids are found a lot in food.
Some songs are sung for international use.
Young goats are called 'kids'.
Some polymers are man-made.
Female sheep are called 'ewes'.
Male sheep are called 'rams'.
Sheep are domesticated animals which have been bred by man.
"Overcoats are made from a warm, heavy cloth or even animal fur."
Carbonyls are found in many natural substances and also in drugs and medicines.
Polyesters are found in plastics.
Baptism is understood as an outward sign of an inward change.
Amines are used a lot in chemistry.
Many flowers flowers are grouped together to form a flower-like structure.
Patches are sewn on with a needle and thread or glued on using a hot iron.
Some patches are sold by tourist stores.
Most adverbs are formed by adding 'ly' to the end of an adjective.
"Lace is made by knitting, crocheting and weaving."
"Pockets come in very different styles, shapes, closed or unclosed with zippers or buttons."
Juices are made by squeezing the juice out of the fruit.
People often put carpets on a floor.
Movement is done with the use of a dice block with the numbers one through ten.
Social workers are provided by the government.
Movement is done with the use of a dice block with the numbers one through ten.
"Some national fruits are officially designated, some are unofficial."
Some games also have a custom border when played on the Super Game Boy.
"Most reptiles are perceived as slimy, nasty creatures."
"Sex is used by plants and animals, and also by fungi and various single-celled organisms."
Offspring produced sexually are genetically somewhat different from either parent.
Sexual reproduction is a process that can only be found in eukaryotes.
Colors are used to show the different states.
Colors are used to show the amount of support each candidate received.
English musicians categorised by the part of England they are from.
English actors categorised by the part of England they are from.
Most jams are cooked.
Some ladders are made in one piece.
Phenol is produced from petroleum.
Vanillin is made from wood and similar plant parts.
Higher temperatures are needed.
English writers categorised by the part of England they are from.
English politicians categorised by the part of England they are from.
Disambiguation pages are used to list links to articles that share the same name.
Some people try to configure their computer to run faster than it was designed to do.
International marketing is developed by many multinational companies on a global level.
Players are asked multiple choice questions with four possible answers.
Snow is made when temperatures are so cold that water vapor changes directly to solid crystals.
"Title is trivial for an encyclopedia subject, content is unreferenced as to pov."
Printing is one of the technologies which has changed the world.
Every note also has the serial and series numbers printed in red ink.
"Every issue also features the signatures, date, and the agreement number printed in black."
"Mood swings can be spontaneous, or triggered by an event."
South Road is used mostly by people living in south parts of Adelaide.
Japan is hit by a large hail storm.
First part is finished.
All input is appreciated.
"City is defined at the state level and ,as such, means different things in each state."
"Municipality is based on political structure, settlements are based on geographic structure."
Japan has an exclusive anime based on the first seven volumes of the manga.
Bets are placed and winnings are paid when the chosen team wins or event happens.
Modules are defined with respect to a ring.
More communities are located a short distance over the border in Western Australia.
Mail is flown in by plane once per week.
Many apples are grown in temperate parts of the United States and Canada.
Extrasolar planets can have many different forms compared to our solar system.
Wild boars are hunted to extinction in Britain.
Most union territories are ruled by administrators sent by the central government.
Itineraries usually have a well-defined path.
Special techniques are used to separate microfossils from rock.
All references are from self-published sources.
Macular edema is treated with focal laser treatment.
Subject is a recently created amateur football club from a small town in Malaysia.
Enzymes are large molecules made from many amino acids.
Some bows nowadays are made from carbon fiber.
Government plans for education there turned against bilingual education.
"Mountains are formed when rock layers are pushed from opposite sides, and they push the crust up."
Most plateaus are near folded mountains.
Dopamine is a type of brain chemical called a neurotransmitter.
"Today there are still ruins left of the old town, protected in parks."
Tests are done to see how good a match the donor's organ of tissue is to the proposed host.
People typically take pride in their work and have a strong desire to be respected for what they do.
Employees often are involved with the design process.
"Players use the left drum to move left, the right drum to move right, and both drums to jump."
"Beats are gotten by grabbing bananas, and lost by being hit or falling."
Scientists study ice cores to find out how the climate was in the past.
Water is supplied from a rainwater tank and a bore.
Political geography is organized or studied in three scaled groups.
Putters are used when on the green .
Primary injuries are caused by the explosion's shock waves.
Voltages are compared to the ground to measure voltage.
Movement is done with the use of a dice block with the numbers one through ten.
Some people also add melted butter to the batter.
Many stars are in a galaxy that has a galactic plane which is used as reference.
Begonias are found in moist subtropical and tropical climates.
Historical accounts indicate cannibalism was widespread at Jamestown during the winter.
Iraqi insurgents release a video claiming to have shot the aircraft down using a missile.
Dutch voters reject the proposed European Constitution.
Synchronized swimming is a sport that is practiced in the water.
Visitors are required to use a local guide if they want to go to 'The Peak'.
New oceans appear once the supercontinent broke apart.
"Humans are the only species living today known to build fires, to cook their food and wear clothes."
Literature is anything made or written using language.
Food additives are used to improve food.
Seated skiers use a specially designed ski for going over snow quickly called a mono-ski.
"Skiers are put in a group based on medical, and their body position when they ski."
Bindings used for skis have a greatest point high level of .
Ski boots are made to connect to the ski at the heel and toe.
"Skiers are put in order based on medical problems, and their body position when they ski."
Skiers are classed inside one of the three groups.
Most species eat small invertebrates picked out of the mud or soil.
Light exists in tiny packets called photons.
White light is made up of many different colors of light added together.
Most species eat small invertebrates picked out of mud or exposed soil.
English comedians categorised by the part of England they are from.
Movement is done with the use of a dice block with the numbers one through ten.
Movement is done with the use of a dice block with the numbers one through ten.
Movement is done with the use of a dice block with the numbers one through ten.
Borders appear only on the top and bottom of any given bar.
Different notes are made by fingering with the left hand while bowing with the right.
Overrides default colour if set.
Most Maglite parts are made from anodized aluminum.
Some quarries fill with water to make small lakes when they are no longer being used for mining.
All fields are optional and unused parameter names can be left blank or omitted.
Electrons can move from one object to another when touched.
Today there are still many books and websites devoted to making sense of dreams.
Chile is a well educated country.
Many premieres are hosted here.
Key signatures are written at the beginning of each line of music.
Some taxes are based on how much money a person earns.
Anarchists are opposed to all taxes.
Anarchists are also opposed to any form of government.
"Snow is very uncommon in Florida, but has fallen in every major Florida city at least once."
"Hammers are used to attack and for other things, like flicking switches and solving puzzles."
Imortant schools are situated there.
"People can also use PCs to play games, which are sometimes called PC games."
Characters are created using a point-based system.
Warlocks cast shadow and fire magic spells.
Flowers are grouped in inflorescences.
Japan is separated from the Asian continent by the Sea of Japan and the East China Sea.
Most oral cancers look very similar under a microscope and are called squamous-cell carcinoma.
Artificial harmonics are written with diamond-shaped note heads.
Sour cream is used in many European and American foods.
Hamburgers are named for a city in Germany called Hamburg.
Tires are made of different types of rubber.
Norse mythology is a set of beliefs and stories shared by Northern Germanic tribes.
Some players have the music transposed into the treble clef.
Most music critics think it was no.
Snow is used for some winter sport activities like skiing and sledding.
Snow plows are used to remove snow from roads to make driving easier and safer.
Mills plays twins trying to get their divorced parents together again.
Fragments are scattered everywhere.
People are crushed or turned into statues.
Old threads are archived automatically.
Clouds are classified according to how they look and how high the base of the cloud is in the sky.
"Maternal bonds are influenced by hundreds of emotional, mental and physical issues."
Water vapor is found in most of the air.
"New chapters are rolled out with updates, each featuring new gameplay tools and supplies."
Minerals are natural solids formed through many geological processes under high pressures.
Protestant groups say that anyone who was baptized can be a priest.
People usually sign a contract when something important or costly is being done.
Bikinis are worn at the hips.
Some business jets are used by air forces for priority and VIP transport.
"Water bombers are used both by air forces, administrations, and private societies."
All decisions are voted on by the people.
Hard drives are used by computers to store data.
Sulfonamides are prepared by the reaction of a sulfonyl chloride with ammonia or an amine.
Potassium permanganate is used as an oxidizing agent.
"City is characterized by hilly, mountainous surface."
Adults think about the person they have been.
Object permanence is seen in children eight to twelve months old.
"Logic runs behind the dogs, armed with the sword 'syllogismus'."
Logic is used by computers in what is called an algorithm.
Logic is used in mathematics.
"Females are about two to three times bigger than the males, but similarly colored."
Tax evasion is an activity connected with the informal economy.
Winners are listed first.
Some moths are farmed.
Females give birth at different times of the year depending on where they are found.
"Most monarchies are hereditary, but some are elected."
"Materials commonly used in moulding include plastic, metal, glass and ceramic."
"Tyres are made using moulds, where the molten rubber is poured into the mould and then left to set."
Historians think that the Korean people have lived in the area for thousands of years.
Christians are said to be persecuted by the authorities.
Refs seem to be self-published.
Scientists think it was water vapour because lightning needs water vapour.
Nobody yet knows what caused the crash.
Systolic pressure is the first number given in blood pressure readings.
Emperors are listed in 'bold'.
"Wood is light, so it is suitable for masks and other objects meant to be carried."
Social cards are free for senior citizens and reduced for students.
Wisdom is defined differently by many cultures.
All comments are welcomed and are very appreciated.
Content is adjusted.
Humans do it only on rare occasions and it is looked down upon in society.
Players are given four lives.
Some problems are made up for fun.
"People donate their own blood, which can be used after the operation if they lose too much blood."
Many attacks are caused when divers accidentally bump into the shark.
Energy is released in a form that can be used for chemical reactions inside cells.
Respiration takes place in a special structure called the 'mitochondria' inside all eukaryote cells.
"Strings are stretched across the length of the fingerboard, raised slightly by the bridge."
Quotations are arranged in order by time within each writer's entry.
Some people think the sound from tube amplifiers is better than transistor-based amplifiers.
Natural compounds are compounds made by plants or animals.
"Plastics are sometimes mostly natural, and other kinds are manufactured."
"Most petroleum is found in the Middle East, North America, and Russia."
Audio crossovers are divided to 'passive' or 'active crossovers'.
Typical components used with passive crossovers are capacitors inductors and resistors.
Some variants are built for reconnaissance and maritime patrol.
Most natural gas is burnt as a fuel to produce energy.
Natural gas is burned to produce electricity and to cook and heat buildings.
"Ammonia is used as a fuel, as a fertilizer for crops, and for making many other things."
Some synagogues repeat the reading many times until every eligible adult is honored.
Smoked hams are cured in brine and then exposed to the smoke from burning wood chips.
Crabs are prepared and eaten all over the world.
Talk pages are for talking about how to make the page that the talk page is related to better.
"Social wasps are formed of paper wasps, yellow jackets and hornets."
"Some forms are caused by bacteria, fungi or parasites."
Homework also helps students to remember what they learned.
Garlics are divided into many parts called '.
"Land reclamation uses the same process, which is sped up."
Waves are found everywhere in the natural world.
Some sharks go into tonic immobility when they are turned upsidedown.
Selenium is found most in sulfide ores like pyrite.
Selenium is gotten as a byproduct.
Selenium is made by oxidizing selenide ores to selenium dioxide.
Selenium is used in photocells.
Many kaiju movies are made in Japan.
Much water is used to separate the oil from the sand and then left polluted.
Some valleys are made by glaciers which are slow-moving rivers of ice.
Many towns are built on the sloping sides of valleys.
Players are given seven letter tiles chosen at random.
Some people kill themselves because they have been bullied.
Syrups are used in many different types of drinks.
Maple syrup is made from the sap from maple trees that is boiled until it thickens.
Sugar beets are grown for sugar.
Most animals live in one type of environment because they are best suited to it.
Plants are adapted to a wide variety of habitats.
Lines are put on paved lots to create the outlines of parking spaces.
Some spaces are set aside for disabled drivers or disabled passengers.
Some lots are poorly supervised and dimly lit.
Ski bindings' keep ski boots connected to skis.
Ski boots are connected to skis by ski bindings.
"Most people think it is important for everyone to be treated equally, fairly and with dignity."
Extra points are awarded for slicing three or more fruits with one swipe.
"Conversion is exact, no rounding is performed."
"Bird cages are used in the home to contain a pet bird, such as a parakeet or a canary."
Multiplication means that one vector is made bigger or smaller.
"Males are easily recognized, they have two horns above their eyes and one horn on their nose."
Some herbs are used in cooking to flavor foods.
"Oils can cause pollution, especially water pollution, if released into the open."
"Hydraulic systems are used for moving very heavy things, like in cranes, excavators, or bulldozers."
Tobacco pipes are used to smoke tobacco.
"All organic monomers are based on carbon, usually with hydrogen, oxygen and nitrogen."
Some entomologists study how insects are related to each other.
Prayer is seen as being therapeutic by many Christian leaders.
Respiratory failure is a direct threat to the life of the person affected.
Particle board is used in building construction and furniture making.
Sheets are formed under pressure and heat.
Antimony sulfide is used in matches.
Editors are free to create books based on whatever criteria they like.
New levels are added through updates.
Stakes are divided into wards.
Young people are encouraged to go on missions when they get old enough.
Different marinades are used in different cuisines.
Fractional numbers are rounded down.
Some caps appear shiny as is covered with a translucent slime.
League is an optional argument which can be used to specify pre-NBA leagues.
Flatworms are one of the invertebrate groups which are studied in school biology.
"Amateurs can use vocaloid, so many songs are created."
Many scholars say that seid was like shamanism.
Triglycerides are a type of lipid found in the blood.
All subjects are taught in English and French.
Many WANs are built for one particular organization and are private.
Many mental illnesses are characterized by certain forms of unwanted automatic behaviour.
Most historians believe that berserkers worked themselves into a rage before battle.
Scientists use the laboratories to compare measurements that are made in different countries.
"Proteins are based on polypeptides, which are unique sequences of amino acids."
Life is based on the chemistry of carbon compounds.
Some sheds are large structures framed by wood.
Some sheds are made out of plastic.
Sheds used on farms can be large and tall structures.
ABA is based on the science of psychology.
ABA is used as a treatment for some psychological disorders and developmental disabilities.
ABA is used to change a person's behavior.
Behaviorists believe that behavior is caused by things that happen in the environment.
Respondent behavior is caused physiological reactions of the body.
ABA has to be based on behaviors.
Behavior analysts have to show that the variable they used is what caused the change in behavior.
Reliability is the likelihood that a certain thing caused a change in behavior.
Generality is a term used to show how meaningful a behavior change is.
High generality means that the change in behavior was meaningful.
Operant behavior is voluntary and can be changed.
Tangible reinforcers are things that can be held.
Reinforcements are given based on schedules of reinforcement.
Differential reinforcement is used to teach people to make correct responses.
Reinforcement is always the first thing that is tried when trying to change a behavior.
Complex behaviors are made up of smaller simple behaviors.
Direct observation is when behavior is watched and recorded.
People can feel lonely even if they are surrounded by a lot of other people.
Indexes are printed about every two weeks.
Home theaters are designed to be like watching a movie at a movie theatre.
Attention is determined by a variety of variables.
Administrative law is used by ordinary citizens who want to challenge decisions made by governments.
Civil law is based on legislation that is found in constitutions or statutes passed by government.
Religious law is law based on religious beliefs or books.
Historians are mixed when it comes to where the document came from originally.
Prohibitions are developed over time and come from parents or other adults.
"Today there are two types of sports psychology, academic and applied."
Today there are three main areas of focus in applied sports psychology.
Surface mining is done when the coal is near the surface.
Gargoyles are similar to grotesques but gargoyles get rid of rainwater throught their mouths.
Most big towers are built as suspension towers.
Rhodium is found in platinum ores.
Rhodium is used as a catalyst in some platinum alloys.
Lead telluride is used in another type of infrared sensor.
Thallium compounds are used in glass for infrared light.
Thallium can be a pollutant if the thallium waste from metal processing is washed away.
Psychologists disagree as to how much and which parts of the mind is constructed modules.
Individual differences are reflected in the amount that a trait is seen.
Psychologists are able to make conclusions about their personalities based on their answers.
Physiological needs are important from the time a person is born and throughout their entire life.
Someone only reaches the self-actualization level once all the other levels are fulfilled.
"Different species are found in grassland, deserts, and forests."
Lawrencium is made from californium.
All advocates are trained to evaluate a family's situation.
Curium has to be made.
Mathematical functions are used to predict or estimate the value of the depenent variables.
Radical feminism is associated with the second wave of feminism.
Extrapolation refers to the use of a fitted curve beyond the range of the observed data.
Crystallization can be divided into stages - primary nucleation is the first.
Every base has a conjugate acid formed by adding a proton to the base.
Black feminists believe that sexism and racism are bound together.
Frozen foods are usually packaged or put in containers.
"Every time money is spent or earned, it is written in the ledger."
Tax accounting is a type of accounting that makes sure tax laws are followed.
"Polonaises have a cutaway, drapes and an overskirt, worn over a petticoat."
Transposons are found in many forms of life.
"Scientists talk about eras like the Mesozoic era, when dinosaurs lived on the Earth."
Mathematics are used to show how likely something is to happen to the particle.
Paper is represented by an open hand.
Arrogance is a common emotion expressed by many people throughout our society.
Similar dinosaurs are found all over the world at that time.
"Cities are grouped into regions, which allow different cities in the same region to be connected."
"Some transistors are individually packaged, mainly so they can handle high power."
Stationary land based platforms have simpler and less costly logistical access to the base.
Construction is conceived as the deployment of a long cable from a large spool.
"Most current designs elevate the spool itself as the main cable is paid out, a simpler process."
Every note also has a seven-pointed star which has only half the printing on each side.
Burping is caused by air being trapped in the stomach.
Bronze is made from copper and tin.
Steel is used in buildings.
Pterosaurs are the earliest vertebrates known to have evolved powered flight.
"Bagels are glazed, and in a ring-shaped roll."
"Bagels are made from the basic bread ingredients of flour, yeast, salt, and sweet kinds of spices."
Some doughnuts are rolled in sweet foods such as sugar or shredded coconut.
"Doughnuts are sold at doughnut shops, bakeries, or grocery stores."
Doughnuts can cause health problems if they are eaten too often.
Some entries are written more than once.
List is organized by absolute height since it includes many different classes of structures.
Refraction is seen most often when a wave passes from one medium to a different medium.
Oceanic countries are island countries found in the Pacific Ocean.
Every acid has a conjugate base formed by removing the acid's proton.
"Many beaches are made of sand, but some beaches are made of gravel."
Civil rights are protected by law and custom.
"Most tacos are made with meat, usually beef, but chicken, pork or fish can also be used."
Antibiotics act quickly and are a powerful way of temporarily getting rid of acne.
"Blogs are usually free to read, but nevertheless some have made fame and fortune for their writers."
Successful prophylaxis means one has anticipated and avoided some undesirable outcome.
"Veins taking blood away from the penis get smaller, so less blood is taken through."
Ejaculation is when semen is pushed from the penis.
"Animal life is limited to gazelles, antelopes, jackals, foxes, badgers and hyena."
Larger pythons can prey on animals as large as a house cat or a full-grown deer.
"Proteins are made out of smaller polypeptides, which are formed of amino acids."
Proteins are made by tiny machines in the cell called ribosomes.
Pizza is a food based on bread.
"Shield volcanoes can produce huge areas of basalt, which is usually what lava is when cooled."
Volcanoes are made when two tectonic plates come together.
Cosmology is the name given to how the universe began and how it has developed.
"Rings are exchanged between the married couple, following which they kiss."
Small hinges are used for jewelery boxes and other small things with lids.
Scientific instruments are objects used in science.
Legal instruments are documents used to show certain legal things.
Vehicle instrument are used to show things about a car.
Platelets are involved in hemostasis through the making of blood clots.
Pickled onions are eaten with chips or with salad.
Chopped onions are put in many stews and curries.
Nihilism is associated with postmodernism.
Retrievers are very good in the water and often used by hunters shooting ducks.
Terriers are used to find the den or living space of the animal.
Curs are used in the same way as terriers but on larger animals.
Some dogs are bred to look special which is why poodles have fluffy hair.
Passengers can stay connected underground.
Dry cells are used in many electrical appliances.
Toasted bread is both darker in color and crunchier than normal bread.
"Canoes are pointed at both ends and usually open on top, but can be covered."
"Paddlers face in the direction of travel, either seated or kneeling."
Oars generally are fastened to the vessel.
Shorts are worn either as outer garment or as underwear.
Sugar is added.
"Moats are deep, wide ditches filled with water."
Olive oil is the juice made by crushing olives.
Almonds are sold either shelled  or unshelled.
Black holes are stars that have collapsed into one very small point.
Columns can be either a single piece or several pieces put together.
"Stock is ownership in a company, broken up into pieces."
"Finance is used by people, by governments, by businesses, etc., as well as by all kinds of groups."
Most binaries are 'detached binaries'.
"Linear algebra uses a system of notation for describing system behavior, called a matrix."
"Plants called cushions grow in tight clumps in the tundra, but lichens are the dominant plants."
Musical intervals are measured logarithmically as semitones.
Fractional semitones are used for non-equal temperaments.
Cities are indicated in 'bold'.
"Sebaceous glands are involved in skin problems such as oily skin, acne, and keratosis pilaris."
Meerkats live in holes in the ground called burrows.
C major is called the 'relative major' of A minor.
"Red meat is darker-coloured meat, different from white meat such as chicken or fish."
Lime juice is used in cooking and in drinks.
"Some fireworks are ground-based, and others are shot into the air."
"Many people know about it, and it is being copied."
Minerals are formed by natural processes.
"Sulphates also occur where hot waters are forced through the rock, as with geysers."
Gold is used in jewelry.
Silver is extracted from the earth in several ways.
Silver is used as a catalyst.
Some silver compounds are used in creams that help burns heal.
Some notebooks also have a printed calendar.
Children are affected by it the most.
"Copper is poured on naked flame which burns off sulfur and other impurities, leaving raw copper."
Metallurgists work to make the metal good when they are used.
Parts are made from ingots different ways.
Ownership is needed for the development of the capitalist socio-economic system.
"Oral law is spoken, as opposed to statutory law, which is written down."
"Beetles have a wide range of chemical defences, mostly got from plants their larvae eat."
"Most species have a single pair of eyes in the middle of their heads, oriented horizontally."
Alpha decay happens when an atom is too big and needs to get rid of some mass.
Some wings have panels on the back called flaps.
Males are winged.
"Clothing is made from many materials, such as cotton, wool, or polyester fabrics and leather."
Astronomical watches are made by several manufacturers.
Rubber boots are used in rainy day.
"Shoes are made of many different types of materials, such as leather, fabric, and plastic."
"Sandals are worn in warm countries, such as the Philippines and Cuba."
"Sandals are also worn indoors in some places, such as in saunas."
Many people wear footwear that is made in a factory.
Raw materials are made into other things.
Cookies are made in an oven.
"Coffee contains a chemical called caffeine, a mild drug that keeps people awake."
Coffee is turned into a drink in several different ways.
Coffee is made into a drink by putting the coffee into boiling water.
Hyaenas are known to have one of the world's strongest bites.
Most spiders make a natural fiber that is also called silk.
"Some sod is grown agriculturally, and is sold to landscapers who use it to quickly get a lawn."
"Music is sound that has been organized by using rhythm, melody or harmony."
"Blues music is music that is played by singing, using the harmonica, or the acoustic guitar."
Tunes are made of notes that go up or down or stay on the same pitch.
Every tune has a rhythm that can be tapped.
Music needs to be written down in order to be saved and remembered for future performances.
Some products made from thermoplastic materials are used for electronics applications.
"Darkness is made by blocking light from the sun or some other source of light, which makes shadow."
Nuclear reactors are used to make electricity.
Humans are known to have migrated extensively throughout history and prehistory.
Experts believe that one third of the world population is infected with 'M. tuberculosis'.
People usually get tuberculosis because of a weakened immune system.
Many different foods are made from different types of grain.
"Students studying in Algeria, however, are issued tourist visas."
Frets are mounted on the long necks of the instrument.
Frets divide the neck into sections related to a musical framework.
Electronic amplifiers have to be connected to electrical current or a battery to work.
Some amplifiers are made to add controlled distortion.
Sock puppets are controlled by putting a hand through a sock.
Socialists believe that everything in society is made by the cooperative efforts of the people.
Telescopes take all the light in a big area and put in into a small area.
"Many astronomers specialise in particular areas of astronomy, called fields."
Many drugs are used as medicine to help make sick people better.
Investment is total amount of money spent by a shareholder in buying shares of a company.
Nothing is solved with bragging and the big mouth alone.
Budgies are intelligent birds and can be taught to mimic human speech.
Filters are used to take away parts of the signal.
Ivory Coast is divided into nineteen regions.
"Larger organisms are made of many cells, and they are called multicellular organisms."
"Cells are born from older cells, in a process called cell division."
"Libertarians oppose slavery, rape, theft, murder, and all other examples of initiated violence."
Most libertarians fall under one of the two types of libertarians listed above.
Blockbusters are made for commercial reasons and art films are made for personal reasons.
Blockbusters often use simple stories and characters that have been used before in other movies.
Quisque gravida ipsum non sapien.
Champagnes have different names depending on how much sugar is added.
Many groups create a government to decide how things are to be done.
Larger snowballs are made by using a ball the size of a hand and rolling it on the ground.
Prisms are used in binoculars to bend the light.
Some disease is helped by surgery.
Visual arts consist of any art that can be seen.
Ductility is the property of solid to be drawn into wires.
Diamonds are rare and are found largely in Africa.
Some cakes are made to celebrate special occasions like birthdays.
Cakes are baked from a batter.
Many religions require the ashes to be handled in dignified manner.
"Train wheels are affixed to a straight axle, such that both wheels rotate in unison."
"Some farmers also raise animals to be used for meat, milk, eggs or other things."
Most true bugs have half of their front wings hardened and have the other half soft.
"Granite is dense, and can be cut, carved and shaped."
Granite is found in many countries of the world.
Flywheels are used for storage of kinetic energy.
Laws are made and enforced in the name of the people.
Persuasion is meant to benefit one or more parties in the end.
All revisions are logged.
Militarism is related to militarization.
Cancer is one of the biggest and most researched causes of death in developed countries.
Autotrophs are needed in every food chain in all ecosystems.
Film is placed inside the camera box.
Photographic film is coated with chemicals that react when light shines on it.
Digital photography is photography done using a digital camera.
Autofocus cameras focus automatically when the shutter release is pressed.
"People say they have seen it, but none have ever been caught."
Radio waves are used for many things today.
Information is stored by changing the magnetism of the particles.
Classical music is also different from jazz because true jazz is improvised.
Snafu is used mostly as a noun.
Phosphates are made of one phosphorus atom surrounded by four oxygen atoms.
Milk shakes are also a cold drink made with an electric blender.
Less water is needed than with soil-grown crops.
Most galaxies are believed to have a supermassive black hole at their center.
"Crops grown on plantations include banana, sugarcane, coffee, tea, cotton and tobacco."
Peanuts are known scientifically as Arachis hypogaea.
"Spanish peanuts are used mostly for peanut candy, salted nuts, and peanut butter."
Most Runners are used to make peanut butter.
Seeds are oval and tightly crowded into the pods.
"Cells are composed of molecules, which are sets of atoms bonded together."
Fluids are amounts of matter composed of molecules and atoms weakly bonded together.
Liquids adopt the shape of the recipients in which they are contained.
"Harmony means notes which are played at the same time, like chords."
"Most attempts are made in the summer, because the days are long and the weather is good."
"Most asteroids are made of rock, but some are made of carbon or metal."
Metabolism uses energy to fuel all organs involved in digestion and respiration and so on.
Humans are the only known mammals to cry as an emotional reaction.
Apricots are brought to Rome from Asia.
Many aristocratic families are ruined.
"Arteries have thick covering, and are situated deep under the skin."
Neoliberalism is also against a centrally governed economy.
Cartels are bad for the economy in general and for their customers who are overcharged.
"True limpets are small marine gastropod molluscs with flattened, cone-shaped shells."
Limpets eat by grazing on algae found on rock surfaces.
"Some crustaceans commonly eaten are the shrimp, prawn, lobster, crayfish, and crab."
Cephalopods are found in all the oceans of the world and at all pelagic levels.
Oxygenated water is taken into the mantle cavity to the gills.
"Cuttlefish have an internal cuttlebone, made of calcium carbonate."
Cuttlefish eyes are among the most developed in the animal kingdom.
"Cuttlefish are caught for food in Mediterranean, and East Asian cultures."
"Female argonauts make a laterally compressed, calcareous eggcase in which they reside."
"Argonauts are preyed upon by tunas, billfishes, and dolphins."
Grooves are used for several purposes in cabinet making and other woodworking fields.
Data structures determine the way in which information can be used.
Molecules are made up of atoms that are stuck together in a particular shape or form.
Aniline is an organic chemical compound produced in two stages from benzene.
Cobalt blue is used widely by artists.
Formal languages are the way to communicate with a given automaton.
Opposite colors are called complementary.
Tin is no longer mined but china clay is still an important industry.
Cider is made there and livestock is farmed.
Many mosques are known for their Islamic architecture.
"All mosques have a prayer hall, which is also called 'musalla'."
"Mosques also hold a special prayer service, called 'jumuah'."
Islamic law requires men and women to be separated in the prayer hall.
Pulmonic consonants are made by obstructing air coming from the lungs.
"All mammals feed their young on milk, which is made by glands in the skin or the mammary glands."
Cardinal numbers are used to measure how many items are in a set.
Numbers are used when things are measured.
Numbers are used to study how the world works.
"Signal processing is the analysis, interpretation and manipulation of acquired signals."
Nations then enter the stadium alphabetically according to the host country's chosen language.
Coal contains sulfur ions which are released when it burns.
"Pure aluminium is made from bauxite, a kind of rock that has aluminium oxide and many impurities."
Drawings are created by making lines on a surface.
Red hair is made by genes.
"Some trails are off-limits to everyone other than hikers, and few trails allow motorized vehicles."
"Some trails are meant as 'nature trails', and are used by people learning about the natural world."
Deflation is thought to be even worse than inflation.
People take a bit of snuff between their fingers and put it in their nostrils to smell it.
"Sodium is a light, silver-coloured metal."
Sodium is so soft that it can be easily cut with a knife.
"Sodium compounds are used in soaps, toothpaste, baking and antiacids."
Sodium ions are found in the ocean.
Some games are played with two dice and some use only one.
Shorthand is where a word is written in a shorter way because it is quicker and easier to type.
Secondary colors are made by mixing the primary colors of light together.
Laws are created often to control violence.
"Nouns are ordered into 'common nouns', and 'proper nouns'."
Some social networks are held together by the ties of religion.
"Fashion is a reflection of a given time, socially, politically, economically, and artistically."
"Fashion is used in different ways such as clothing, culture, religions etc."
Rice is believed to have been first grown in ancient southern China and India.
Brown rice is rice that has only had the outer layer removed.
Many musicians think it was one of the greatest pieces of music ever written.
Heresy is to deny the authority of a established authority.
Cattle are the most common type of large domesticated hoofed animals.
Cattle usually stay together in groups called 'herds'.
"Steers have no other purpose except to be raised, sold and slaughtered for beef."
Annelids are made of one or more body segments.
Crinoids have a mouth on the top surface that is surrounded by feeding arms.
Thunder is made when lightning strikes.
Many species are threatened or endangered due to loss of habitat or habitat fragmentation.
"Woodpeckers operate mainly on tree trunks, staying in place propped up by their stiff tail feathers."
"China invents paper, which is first used by the military."
"Dill seed is used as a spice, with a flavor similar to caraway."
Greenhouses are used to grow crops in cold countries such as Canada.
Greenhouses usually have vents that can be opened to let excess heat out.
Echidnas are one of the two types of mammals that lay eggs.
Visible light is produced when the photon production increases.
Bioluminescence is found in the sea at all levels.
Bioluminescence is used as a lure to attract prey by several deep sea fish such as the anglerfish.
Metallic bonds are found in metals like zinc.
Many fables are so well-known that their morals have become English sayings.
Most resistors used in electronics today are carbon resistors.
Mushrooms grown in full sunlight tend to have more.
Online identity is the digital identity established by computer network users.
Less water is wasted.
Pentatonic scales are very common and are found in folk music from all over the world.
Ambulances are sent out by emergency medical dispatchers.
Termites are actually more closely related to cockroaches and mantids.
Ant colonies can be long-lived.
"Indigo is a dye made from the indigo plant, used to dye cloth."
Hot chocolate is usually drank in cold weather and winter in the United States.
Diuretics increase the amount of urine that is secreted from the body.
Green tea is a tea that has undergone little oxidation while it was processed.
Some churches have very rough brick 'facades' because the marble was never put on.
Doctors use it to describe patients who have lost parts or all of their ability to focus attention.
Some water turbines are designed for Pumped storage hydroelectricity.
Radio waves are used to send and receive communications.
Iron oxides are used in pigments.
Hierarchy is when one person is seen as being more important than another person.
Turbines are driven by a fluid which acts as an intermediate energy carrier.
Logo is usually an interpreted language.
Power is defined formally as units of energy per unit time.
Cells require protection from the environment and are usually packaged tightly behind a glass sheet.
Solar cells are regarded as one of the key technologies towards a sustainable energy supply.
Snowmobile studs made from steel or stainless steel with carbide tips are installed in the tread.
Archaeology shows that many people lived here during the Roman occupation.
"Some people also add flavourings to whipped cream, such as vanilla."
Whipped cream is used in many types of desserts.
Vaporization is when a person is murdered by being turned into vapors.
Carbohydrates are compounds made up of sugars.
Proteins are organic compounds that consists of the amino acids joined by peptide bonds.
Fats consist of a glycerin molecule with three fatty acids attached.
Winter cover crops such as oats or rye have long been used as green manures.
Infant mammals are fed on by milk from their mothers.
All gerbils are adapted to arid habitats.
Lions live in groups that are called prides.
Chocolate syrup is used in many different types of drinks.
Nature often suffers when hedgerows are taken away to make fields bigger.
Radiation is given off from the nucleus of unstable isotopes of radioactive substances.
Passports are given by national governments.
Dingos are protected in national parks and reserves.
"Antibiotics have no effect on viruses, but several antiviral drugs have been developed."
"Plants have a rigid cell wall made of cellulose, and fungi one of chitin."
Viruses are used widely in cell biology.
"Microprocessors are made from silicon, quartz, metals, and other chemicals."
Microprocessors are classified by the size of their data bus or address bus.
"Green trails are easiest, blue trails are more difficult, and black trails are rated most difficult."
Polysaccharides are long molecules made from many units joined together.
"Saturated lipids contain single bonds, and are found in butter and lard."
Some oils are made from plants and used in foods and for cooking.
Flasks are used to contain substances.
Homeless counts are required by the government agencies that deal with homelessness.
Some organisms are made up of millions of cells.
Potential energy is divided into three different types of energy.
"Work is defined as force over a distance, and work is another word for energy."
"Ships are used for travel, trade and war."
"Some boats have sails, some are powered by rowing with oars, and some use motors."
Morocco now leads the world in canned anchovies.
"Clams eat plankton, and are eaten by small sharks and squid."
"Animals hunted include flies, wasps, bees, locusts, beetles, caterpillars, dragonflies and spiders."
"Most clipboards are made of masonite or particleboard, two types of wood."
Deputies are elected in each constituency through a two-rounds system.
"Natural law is a theory that says that there are laws given by nature, valid everywhere."
"Female dragonflies lay eggs in or near water, often on plants."
"Sight is by far their most important sense, used to catch flies and avoid birds."
Tickets are sold for 'sol' or 'sombra'.
Modern scholarship is divided on the subject.
"Fuel oil is made of long hydrocarbon chains, particularly alkanes, cycloalkanes and aromatics."
Fractional distillation is how petroleum is refined.
Pheromones are odors that are deliberately used for communication.
"Markets sell dried noodles and 'men-tsuyu', or instant noodle broth, to make home preparation easy."
Toppings are chosen to reflect the seasons and to balance with other ingredients.
"Most toppings are added without much cooking, although some are deep-fried."
Revenue is divided into three categories.
Religious profanity is called 'blasphemy'.
Language revival wants to save a language that is dead or endangered.
"Reptiles have a dry skin, usually protected by scales."
Many people say people are driven to make art due to their inner creativity.
China has a continuing problem with trade in endangered species.
Some works are written for two people to play together using two pianos.
"True wine is made by fermenting grapes, and perhaps other fruit."
Excuses are found for the drinking habit.
Alcohol use is stopped abruptly.
Alcohol use is lowered and lowered.
"Most Polish counties are named after their capital city, or county seat."
Tendons are part of the human body often connected to joints.
"Some prizes are given out in famous ceremonies, such as the Oscars."
Societies have ways in which people's religious beliefs are celebrated.
Phenotypes are determined mainly by genes and are influenced by environmental factors.
Blood donations are kept liquid using citric acid.
Monocytes have a kidney bean shaped center and lots of cytoplasm.
Eosinophils are round cells with a lobed nucleus and granules which turn red when stained.
Pastry dough is rolled out thinly and used as a base for baked products.
Pastry is also the name given to various kinds of baked products.
Glycolysis is thought to be the archetype of a universal metabolic pathway.
Some prototypes are used to find defects.
Invisible comments are used to talk with other editors in the article body.
Some parties are formed around a single issue or interest group.
"Fog is made up of tiny water droplets or, in very cold conditions, ice crystals."
"Clamps are used in technical work, such as woodworking."
Photographs are made with cameras.
Pictures made with paint and brush are called 'paintings'.
Architects are people trained to design buildings.
"Caecilians are found in tropical Africa, Asia and Central and South America."
Most human beings are born from a mother and a father.
Every tag needs to be properly nested and closed.
"Some species live in trees, and some types of frog are protected by being poisonous."
Most adults live where they grew up.
Many chemical compounds can be dangerous but are safe if they are used the right way.
Radioactive decay is calculated using differential equations.
"Wood is used for construction of buildings or furniture, and also for art."
Paper is made from wood fibres.
"Regular pencils are made of wood, with dark graphite inside for writing."
"Most paper is made from pine, spruce and eucalyptus."
Pangolins curl up when they feel scared so that their soft belly is hidden from attack.
Items created in Conakry include food products and materials used for building houses.
Pups are born with their eyes open and covered in fur.
"Some authorities consider the geomyoids related to squirrels, beavers, and mountain beavers."
"Some honey bees make honeydew into a dark, strong honey, called honeydew honey."
Virtual memory is the idea that the application 'sees' a 'block of memory' of a given size.
Bonsai trees are trained to grow into a shape that is pleasing to look at.
Bottled water is recommended for drinking.
Spectrometers are used in spectroscopic analysis to identify materials.
Spectroscopes are used often in astronomy and some branches of chemistry.
Shield volcanoes are formed by lava that flows easily.
Shield volcanoes are known to form on other planets.
Eruptions forming even larger calderas are known.
Secondary stress is shown by  and  respectively.
Stress marks are placed before the syllables concerned.
Some names are given a long time after their death.
Fashion models are used to sell clothing or cosmetics.
"Models are contacted directly by advertising agencies, photographers and others."
"Many food plants are, or are grown as, annuals, including most domesticated grains."
"Peas grow best in slightly acid, well-drained soils."
Chopsticks are used in many countries.
"Chopsticks are used in cooking to stir materials in a pan, or to help move meals."
Computers can use a machine called a modem to talk to other computers over a telephone line.
Turbojet engines are used on airplanes.
"Tepees are made from long poles, and are covered with material."
"Chisels are used by artists to make statues and figures out of stone, marble, or wood."
Headstones are bought so that everyone can see who has been buried in a specific grave.
Plays can be very interesting because they can be understood in many different ways.
Water is transported from the roots to the rest of the plant through special vessels in the plant.
"Some salamanders use their pineal body to perceive polarised light, which helps navigation."
All words are made from at least one syllable.
Fillets are formed into frozen blocks.
Acceleration is the change of velocity divided by the change of time.
Predictions are given by science or fortune tellers or horoscopes.
Different filters are used to select the wavelength of light which the solution absorbs the most.
Products made in the city include furnitures and brandies.
Optical illusions are the best known and understood.
"Some buildings are heated with heat pumps, also."
"Some heat pumps use heat energy, supplied by a flame or an electric heater."
Many coastal areas are protected nature reserves.
Most butterflies have thin slender filamentous antennae which are club shaped at the end.
Some moths have a lobe on the forewing called a 'jugum' that helps in coupling with the hindwing.
Most moth caterpillars spin a cocoon made of silk when they go into the pupal stage.
Moths usually rest with their wings spread out to their sides.
"Some larvae are covered with hairs, or other body extensions."
Adults have a mouth part called a proboscis.
Skippers have their antennae clubs hooked backward like a crochet.
People sitting close together appear at greater risk of becoming infected.
"Waves form a basis for both, provided one incorporates quantum theory."
Player moves to the scenes to seek evidence and get the information from the people concerned.
Parameters are described in the table below.
References are to be included in their respective section footnotes field.
Some sticks are made for certain instruments.
Udon dough is made from wheat flour and salt.
"Products made from wood fibres include paper, straw, bamboo, cotton, hemp, sugar cane."
"Professional wrestling is done as a show, like a play."
Forest is located on land that was once dense forest.
Fume hoods have a large glass window that is opened when a scientist needs to get inside.
Most chemical reactions are done inside a fume hood.
Departments are divided into municipalities.
Municipalities are divided into 'corregimientos'.
Some programmers are famous because their software is used by many people.
Programming languages are used to make all computer programs and computer software.
Many programs now are 'compiled'.
Stack based languages look at the some of the program's memory like a stack of cards.
Objects are pieces of memory with the same structure that can be used again and again.
All objects are created from templates called classes.
Objects created from a class are called 'instances' of the class.
Muscle contraction happens because of chemical messages made by nerves of that muscle.
Dunes have different forms and sizes based on their interaction with the wind.
Home plate is a piece of hard rubber and the other bases are made of cloth.
"Most wasabi is a green paste that is really made from horseradish, mustard and food coloring."
Prions are structurally altered versions of small proteins that are normally expressed in cells.
"Countries can also get their independence peacefully, like Canada and Norway did."
Proper nouns are the only nouns in English which have the first letter capitalized.
Slate is mined in the mountains.
Toilets are supposed to use gravity to work.
"Amethysts are found in Brazil, Uruguay, Ontario, and North Carolina."
Warships are made in many different sizes.
Helicopter carriers are used by the United States Marine Corps and some navies.
Water drawn from the Sea of Galilee irrigates large amounts of land in Israel.
Most Israeli farms are organized as moshavim or kibbutzim.
Polymers are long chains of atoms bonded to one another.
"Many trees produce resin, but usually it is broken down by physical and biological process."
Nuclear weapons are made from the elements uranium or plutonium.
Comic strips are short comics which are often found in newspapers.
Gin is flavored with juniper berries.
Children are sold into the global sex trade every year.
Diamonds are the hardest natural substance known to man.
Gazelles are known as fast animals.
Reserve parachutes are packed and deployed differently.
"Voltage is the pressure pushing the electrons through the wires, it is measured in volts."
Symbols are used to remind people of their religious beliefs.
Many religions have sub-groups which are called denominations.
Solid particles are stopped.
Film comes in a can called a canister to cover it from light rays.
People can learn more complex wikicode by looking at the output of a substituted template.
"Most lilies grow from a bulb, which is sometimes eaten as a food."
Many species are endangered.
Caches usually use what is called a 'backing store'.
Web caches reduce the amount of information that needs to be transmitted over the network.
Computer memory is used as an intermediate store.
Metallic hydrogen is known to exist in the cores of Jupiter and Saturn.
"Latin nouns are 'declined', or changed, according to how they are used in the sentence."
Every ship needs to be registered in a port.
Holidays are made by religions or countries.
Some countries are divided into 'provinces'.
"Trousers are worn ironed, with a crease."
Salt is used to control the amount of water in the body.
Some businesses are created to get more money for the owner of the business.
Janissaries are created.
Intelligent design suggests that life is too complex to have evolved.
"Condoms are rolled up when they are packaged, and are meant to be rolled over an erect penis."
"Antiviral medications are given, which prevent the virus from making copies of itself."
"Pianos use the keys to move hammers that hit strings inside, making a sound."
Hedonism is focused around pleasure.
Stems have tissue called the meristem which contains dividing cells.
Maple sugar is got from trunks of maple trees.
Meristematic cells are packed closely together without intercellular cavities.
"Apical meristems are very small, compared to the cylinder-shaped lateral meristems."
Copper is found in small amounts in living things.
Copper is used in electrical wiring.
Copper is made pure by electrolyzing it.
Many protists take the form of single-celled flagellates.
Gametes are produced by 'germ cells'.
Raster images are used for example when printing something.
Many crops are grown along the sides of the Mississippi.
"Most breakfast cereals are targeted to be sold to kids, but there are many for adults as well."
Bloom filter is a probabilistic method to find a subset of a given set.
Some music stands are made of wood.
Cumulative voting is used to elect representatives in many companies.
"People born in Taurus are calm, patient, reliable, loyal, affectionate, and ambitious."
Visual stimuli are considered elegant if a small number of colors and stimuli are used.
Cranes usually build their nests in marshy areas and lay two eggs at a time.
Cranes can make sounds that are heard from far away.
All cranes are protected by international agreement.
Many maids are required by their employers to wear a uniform.
Most nitrogen fixation is done by micro-organisms called bacteria.
Exponents are used in algebra.
"Atoms are made of neutrons, protons, and electrons."
Some variations change the way the cells look or where they are put.
Some small ones are cranked by some's arms or legs.
Bigger ones are connected to an engine.
Bulgarian independence is recognised.
Salsa music is based on Cuban music.
All sounds are made by vibrations of molecules through which the sound travels.
Frequency is determined by the number of vibrations per second.
Red corundum is called Ruby.
Hawks soar with wings raised slightly above horizontal.
Homer drives to the waste site to get rid of the silo.
Some yarns are made from a blend of several kinds of fibers.
Some yarns are made from a blend of several kinds of fibers.
Eagles are thought as messengers between gods and humans.
Electric blankets are heated by electricity.
Many Muslim women wear a headscarf known as a hijab.
Gravers come in a variety of shapes and sizes that give different line types when used.
"Flat gravers are used for doing work on letters, as well as most musical instrument engraving work."
Most decks are made with six to nine-plywood layers.
Some decks made from maple plywood are dyed to make many different colored plywood.
Members are elected for a maximum of four years at a time.
Some boots are held on with 'bootstraps' or 'bootlaces'.
Scientific research uses hypotheses based on ideas or earlier knowledge.
Square columns are there that once held up the roof of the temple.
Asexuality is described as a spectrum.
Intelligent design is another explanation saying that life was developed by a smarter being.
Larger alkanes have two or more carbon atoms connected or bonded together.
"Scrums still exist within sevens, composed of just three players from each team."
Government is how people organize themselves to be directed by politics.
Dominion is an old word often heard to describe Canada when it was part of the British Empire.
Plane figures made of lines are called polygons.
Artificial sweeteners are used in many 'Light'-products today.
Salami is a sausage that first came from Italy.
Some kinds are made of beef while others mix beef and pork.
Many salamis are named after the city or region where they come from.
Some statues seem to have been destroyed in a rather methodical way.
Cultivars are used as ornamental plants.
"Some gardens are built indoors in malls, public buildings, or greenhouses."
Greenhouses are special buildings where plants are grown.
"Farms are businesses which sell the crops, fruit, and vegetables that are produced."
"Meters are converted to feet and inches, and feet and inches are converted to meters."
Bases are matched to synthesize the new partner strands.
Many enzymes are involved in the DNA replication fork.
Flamingos have a curved bill that is shaped like a banana.
People continue developing simplified English today.
Traits selected by mate choice are called 'ornaments'.
Human feces leave the intestinal tract and are removed from the body through the anus.
Feces are known for their unpleasant odor and brown color.
Feces are used by some scientists to follow tiger populations.
Electricity arrives at our homes through wires from the places where it is made.
Electricity is sent on wires.
"Electric power is the rate at which electric energy is being used, stored, or transferred."
Electricity is made in power stations.
Romance languages are derived from Latin.
"Plants are grouped into floras based on region, period, special environment, or climate."
Shire counties are divided into non-metropolitan districts.
Some people make their own biodiesel by converting old oil that is used in restaurants to fry foods.
Compound machines are made up of two or more simple machines.
Laws help to make sure people have rights and that their rights are taken care of.
Empirical knowledge is built up from what is received through the senses.
Many modern timpani have pedals which tighten or slacken the drum head.
Complications arise since the dinosaurs have escaped because of the power failure.
Vibrato is used to make a melody sound more beautiful by making it more expressive.
"Vibrato has to be learned carefully, as the hand needs to be very relaxed."
Musicians sometimes disagree about how much vibrato was used in earlier times.
Most people believe the world was created in a flood.
Different notes are made by fingering with the left hand while bowing with the right.
Emmental cheese is amongst the best-known types of cheese.
More endorphins are released in the pituitary gland during times of pain or stress.
Buildings owned by the RED team are also usually red and made of wood.
Control points closer to a team's spawn point are captured more quickly by the enemy team.
"Nicknames often come from how a person looks, or from something they are especially known for doing."
Many avatars have to be earned.
"Larger mouthpieces are used on larger instruments, and smaller ones are used on smaller instruments."
Energy conservation is used to burn less fossil fuel.
Ammonia is used to create fertilizers to use on farms.
Timpani are different from other drums because they are tuned to certain musical notes.
Timpani are played with a special kind of drumstick called 'timpani mallets'.
"Sodium hydroxide is used to make paper, detergents and soap."
Calcium carbonate is used as a building material.
Magnesium hydroxide is used to help with stomach aches or indigestion.
Devolved assemblies depend on the parent body.
Oregano is an ingredient needed for Greek cuisine.
Pork sausages have to be heated until all of the meat inside is cooked.
All trains are operated using electricity.
Aromatic hydrocarbons are aromatic organic molecules that form flat ring-shaped bonds.
Civil engineering is made up of many different areas or disciplines.
Nobody knows how many people have committed suicide by jumping off the bridge.
Housing commonly includes detached and semi-detached houses and flats.
Possums are native to Australia and are protected there.
Legend claims that they lived near the Major Oak.
Babies can get the virus from their mothers when they are born or when they are breastfeeding.
Aboriginals are the native people of Tasmania and have lived there for a very long time.
All local engines are depleted.
Chromatography is much used in biochemistry and analytical chemistry.
Some concert halls are purpose-built.
Fighting continues until order is restored and neither army is in the other country.
"Homicide is suspected, but never proven."
Most natural sponges used for cleaning today come from the Mediterranean and the Caribbean.
Planetesimals are created when dust particles collide.
Whales are thought to sleep around eight hours a day.
"Whales are known to teach, learn, cooperate, scheme, and even grieve."
Modern anchors are designed to be better than the plow and claw types.
Light trespass is when light being used by a person goes into the property of another.
"More complicated work needs dozens of elements, all combined into a single scene."
Wired networks require cables to be laid.
Special care needs to be taken to encrypt information.
"Hominids are primates with no tails, robust bodies and well-developed forearms."
Some small ones are used for scientific or business purposes.
Marble is a metamorphic rock formed from limestone.
"Intrusions vary widely, from mountain range sized batholiths to thin vein-like fracture fillings."
Tides are limited by the narrow connection with the Atlantic Ocean.
People often bring wreaths made of poppies to Remembrance Day ceremonies.
Some courts are higher and can change a decision made by a lower court.
Birthday is a day to celebrate that the person has lived a certain number of years.
Similar words are used to identify the body being orbited.
All parameters can be any valid numeric expression which is evaluated before computing.
Most meatballs are made out of beef.
"Different seeds have different habits, no doubt adapted to their habitat."
Growth is triggered by particular events in the environment.
Salt licks placed nearby can stop porcupine damage.
Every episode is a group of tips to surviving a school based activity.
"Full names are given including middle, maiden and married names."
Geographic determinism means that historians think history is mostly caused by geography.
Economic determinism means that historians think history is mostly caused by economics.
"Primary sources are distinguished from secondary sources, which often  build upon primary sources."
Many songs are written by two or more people.
"Fjords are narrow with steep sides, and are created by large masses of snow moving over land."
Married people get many benefits from being married.
Curtains are hung around showers to keep water off the floor around the shower.
Many cheap lenses are plastic but better ones are made from glass.
"Fluid mechanics is a subdiscipline of continuum mechanics, as illustrated in the following table."
Boys are supposed to be tougher than girls.
Inventions are made by inventors.
Meals have different names by time they are taken or by the type of food that is eaten.
Some people also keep collections of dead butterflies that they have caught.
Electrons are pushed through a wire by the voltage.
"Eggs are versatile, that means they can be used and cooked in many different ways."
Some people say that it was scarlet fever or meningitis.
Today there are only a few ruined stone foundations.
Some euphemisms are intended to be humorous.
Contestants can ring in to solve the puzzle before the last letter is revealed.
Pillows are covered with a fabric sheet called a pillowcase.
Raster images are based on pixels.
Raster images are used very often.
Computer screens are made of a raster of points.
Pallone is played on courts marked out on town streets.
Decadence is usually a state in a society which used to be good but has become bad.
Soils are more developed in areas with higher rainfall and more warmth.
Coniferous forests have acidic leaf litter and form what are known as inceptisols.
Rocks are classified by their minerals and chemical make-up.
"Igneous rocks are formed when molten magma cools, either above or below the surface."
"Layers are made by deposition of sediment, organic matter, and chemical precipitates."
Metamorphic rocks are formed by rocks coming under great pressure and high temperatures.
"Wind erodes the Earth's surface by removing loose, fine-grained particles, called 'deflation'."
Male cattle are castrated to improve docility for use as oxen.
"Pots are used for boiling liquids, like soups or stew."
"Liquid has an almost-fixed volume, but no set shape."
Crows are found on every continent except for the southern area of South America and Antarctica.
"Most crows are found in South America, Central America, Europe and Asia."
"Traditional instruments used include the banjo, mandolin, guitar and bass."
Most children are toilet trained while they are toddlers.
Trance music is played in clubs.
Warthogs are found in moist and arid savannas.
Albatrosses are known for their clumsyness when landing.
Albatrosses take care of their young chicks until they have grown enough to defend themselves.
"Red dwarfs are usually far too faint to be seen with the naked eye, that means without a telescope."
Liquid particles are called 'droplets'.
Services are used by other computers that are called clients.
Asian elephants are spread over areas with very different amounts of rain.
Sommeliers have exams and qualifications which are recognised internationally.
People often buy flowers from businesses called florists.
Honey is flower nectar that has been collected and processed by bees.
"Some people put flowers from nasturtiums, chrysanthemums, or carnations in their food."
"People also say they 'feel guilty', if they think they have been unfair or done something wrong."
Spring scales are made with the assumption that they are being used on the surface of the Earth.
ZIP codes are numbered with the first number representing a certain group of U.S. states.
Scientists believe that the rings are the material left after a moon broke apart.
Astronomers believe that the lightning observed in Saturn is the strongest ever seen.
Many artificial things imitate or copy things found in nature.
Tusks are made of ivory.
Many elephants are killed for their tusks.
Soaps are made from animal fats or vegetable oils.
Egyptian documents says that a soap-like substance was used in the preparation of wool for weaving.
Bare fiberglass can cause skin irritation and cuts when handled without gloves.
Surveyors are needed to make land maps and boundaries for ownership of land.
Players suck up the trash and wash the vomit that has collected in the theme parks.
English meter is founded on the patterns of stressed and unstressed syllables.
Most commercial aircraft are flown in the Tropopause.
"English language is about the English language, how it developed, and where it is spoken today."
Some versions are marketed to hikers and backpackers.
All packages are delivered to a local warehouse.
"Some tunnels are used for cars, and others are used for trains."
Some tunnels are built for communication cables and some are built for electricity cables.
"Tunnels are dug in different kinds of grounds, from soft sand to hard rock."
Some tunnels are used by prisoners to escape jail.
Most people have the nationality of the country where they are born and grow up.
"Carnosaurs are characterized by several features, mostly modifications of the pelvis and hind legs."
Some shipping channels are kept deeper through dredging.
Balls are marked with different coloured dots.
Rare words are less well known than common words.
"Word length is measured by counting the letters in each word, or by counting syllables."
Cattle are raised in the south central and western parts of the province.
"Adults feed almost only on fish, although some individuals have been known to eat dead animals."
Escarpments here are called rupes.
Direct current is created by devices such as batteries and solar panels.
Inverters are made in many different sizes.
Computer speakers are plugged in to a device controller called an audio device.
Tropical cyclones are ranked according to their maximum winds using several scales.
People are tested to see what they have learned.
Red satellites are blocked by the Earth.
Psyche appears to be a case of an exposed metallic core from a bigger differentiated parent body.
Birds are classified by most paleontologists as belonging to the subgroup Maniraptora.
"All positive potential including unlimited compassion, skill and wisdom are said to be realized."
Prize money is awarded to the winners.
"Steel is used to making buildings and bridges, and all kinds of machines."
Every material is made up of atoms which are very small parts.
Treaties are signed by members of the government of a country.
Many theorists suggest that Oswald conspired with others to kill the president.
"Many toads also burrow, though that depends on the environment that the toad evolved in."
"Toads lay eggs in strings attached to rocks, unlike true frogs which lay eggs in a jelly-like mass."
Toads have paratoid glands behind their eyes which are used to make poison.
Categories are pages that are used to group other pages on similar subjects together.
Pages are put into categories by placing one or more 'Category tags' on the page.
Pages are sorted alpha-numerically by their sort key.
Mobile browsers are made to display Web content in the best way for small screens on mobile devices.
Trademarks are protected by law.
Trademarks are used for products.
Heat is added in the process of distillation which extracts a pure liquid.
Most people say that it was a dictatorship.
Some people say that there is corruption in the way senir jobs are filled.
Carcinogens come from both natural and man-made substances.
Alpha radiation is a carcinogen when breathed in or eaten.
Club soda is a clear drink that is sometimes used to help remove stains from clothing.
Most uniforms used are black and white or all black.
Authority is known as one of the basis of society and stands against cooperation.
Authority is made by a certain social power.
"Studios are usually soundproofed, to keep outside noises from getting into recordings."
"Examples are headaches, nausea, rash, constipation, blurred vision and others."
Stamp hinges are used by stamp collectors to put postage stamps onto the pages of  the stamp album.
Some antihistamines are used in sleep aids explicitly because they cause drowsiness.
Oil is discovered in Saudi Arabia.
"Irrigation can let more crops be grown on the same land, or allow a crop to grow in a dry period."
Many people use theses sites to share videos they have made with their family and friends.
Parliament is where laws are made.
English literature is written by authors from many countries.
Several people are killed because of the cold weather.
Sums are used to represent series and sequences.
Movement is done with the use of a dice block with the numbers one through ten.
Lighthouses are built on the coast of an ocean or lake.
Posters are made to be shown on a wall or other flat surface.
Scanners are used for scanning.
Printers are programmed using a programming language.
Microtubules are made of a protein called 'tubulin'.
Proprioception is used when a person touches the tip of their nose while keeping their eyes closed.
Fats are made from lipid molecules.
Lipids are classified as simple and complex.
Executive power is exercised by the government.
Many flights are cancelled.
"Female convicts are landed at Sydney, leading to a wild night of sex, rape and a riot."
All insects are the descendants of a group of animals who lived a long time ago.
"Evolution only concerns the traits which can be inherited', wholly or partly."
Variation can only affect future generations if it is inherited.
Genetic variation is increased by gene mutations.
Genetic drift is the name given to random changes which remove variation from a population.
Smoking is banned in all public places in Scotland.
Slides are made of metal or wood.
"Mortals also drink it, giving then visions that are thought to be divine."
"All citizens are guaranteed to be equal, and government decisions can be challenged in court."
Epithelium is found on the surface of organs and many other parts of the body.
New words are invented or words change their meaning.
"Pop art is a connection between reality and art, handled with abstract means."
Sound waves are converted into an electrical signal inside the recorder.
Required parameters are displayed in orange.
Some pages are protected.
Image is centered by default.
Source code is written in a programming language which a human can read and change.
Similar process are used to produce animal feed.
Websites are composed of pages linked by hypertext links.
"Flash drives are used to store any type of data file, or to move data from one computer to another."
"Some flash drives can keep the data, even if they are put in water."
"Flash drives use little power, compared to hard drives and have no moving parts."
Flash drives are small and are easily lost or left behind.
Flash drives can hold a large amount of information and they are used worldwide.
Ostriches are farmed in several countries.
"Sharks have different-shaped teeth, depending on what they eat."
Sharks have skin covered in millions of tiny teeth-like scales that point to the tail.
"Pups are born with a full set of teeth, and are capable of taking care of themselves."
Pages are watched closely.
Shame is rooted in a social or cultural environment.
"Most seeds come from fruits, and the seeds are released from the fruit."
Bellows are used by blacksmiths or metalworkers for smelting and welding.
Most video games are copyrighted and there are no free images available.
Web browsers are used by people to find and look at web sites on the Internet.
"Puppies play with football-themed dog toys on a miniature, or very small, football field."
Inductors are used often in analog circuits.
Transformers are used in every power grid around the world.
All students wear white short-sleeved shirts.
"Tourism can damage the local culture, and certain local traditions are being put aside for tourists."
Small clinics are run by one or more general practitioners or practice managers.
"Some clinics are operated, or run, by employers."
Winners are selected by a jury of judges during the week before the ceremony is held.
Winners are awarded with a golden horse statuette.
Web pages are connected by links.
Webpages are hosted on web servers and downloaded and viewed with a web browser.
Web pages are sent to the browser in HTML code.
Shrines are built in the surroundings of the grave of pious men.
Most church music is based on singing.
"Winners are chosen by celebrity judges, and also audience votes."
Most music videos feature the artist who recorded the song singing or lip-syncing it on screen.
Wine is made by the fermentation of the sugar in grapes.
"Red wine is made from red grapes, and white wine is made from white grapes."
Wine is made in many countries.
Gas exchange occurs in the air sacs where oxygen is exchanged with carbon dioxide.
"Different blocks are made with different chemicals, like paradichlorobenzene or naphthalene."
Some articles are much more likely to be read by kids and others by more mature readers.
Some decisions are taken by the mayor.
Flashbacks also reveal events that happened before the show opened.
Sartene wine is well known amongst wine buffs as being a good drop.
Cattle are mostly black and naturally polled or hornless.
Stars can change very much between when they are first created and when they run out of energy.
Overseas territories are listed below.
Demand is the amount of goods that people want to buy at a given price.
Pipelines are made of metal.
"Hockey is played by both men and women at the Olympic games, and at world championships."
Soviet forces get the almost completely destroyed Polish city of Warsaw.
Fire can be very useful if it is treated carefully.
Any number divided by zero has no answer.
"Any number divided by itself equals one, except if that number is zero."
Doctors go to medical school to be trained.
Protons are made of quarks.
Guests can ride steam-powered trains for a ride around the edge of Disneyland.
Zinc sulfate is used in dyes and pigments.
Zinc sulfide is used in fluorescent bulbs to convert the ultraviolet light to visible light.
Zebras are known for having many black and white stripes .
Many zoos are centers where rare animals are preserved when they are in danger of dying out.
"Love is based on respect, understanding, and being able to talk with each other."
Semiconductor diodes are made of two types of semiconductors connected to each other.
"Pornography is a picture, movie or writing that is created to make people get sexually excited."
Pornography is made to entertain adults.
"Many people are involved in making, selling or showing pornography."
"Blockhouses are like bunkers, but are built above ground."
Ethylene is made in the chemical industry by steam cracking.
"Sugar is contained in certain kinds of food, or it is added to give a sweet taste."
"Sugar is extracted from certain plants, such as sugarcane or Sugar beet."
Simple carbohydrates are made of only one or a few of the smallest sugars.
Complex carbohydrates are made of 'many' of the smallest sugars.
Fair trade helps people in developing countries sell to people in developed countries.
"Dietary fiber has many parts that plants have, and  is eaten in plant foods."
Dogs are made of cheese.
Black bread mould is found in all countries of the world.
Some basilicas are built because a miracle or special sign took place.
Austrian nobility is granted freedom of religion.
Loggerheads are called 'hatchlings'.
Electricity made by nuclear power plants is called nuclear power.
"Some examples are deer, monkeys, wild pigs, tapirs and other animals found in Asia."
"Companions are named under the Doctors they travelled with, and sorted by first appearance."
"Most cheetahs live in Africa, but very few can be found in South Asia and India."
"People are sold, bought, and traded much like slaves."
Widespread damage is caused to buildings and roads.
Gibbons are known to be the best tree travelers in the animal kingdom.
Investigators announce that the cause of the crash was a bomb hidden inside a radio-cassette player.
Serfdom is abolished in Russia.
Popper is known for  the idea of empirical falsification.
Damage is reported on both sides of the border.
"Some scooters have a motor, some have pedals, and some are pushed with the foot."
Sea snakes are found in warm coastal waters from the Indian Ocean to the Pacific.
National elections are held in Hungary.
Huts are found built in straight rows.
Findings also show that the region was occupied only seasonally.
Many computers have a basic video and graphics capabilities built-in to the computer's motherboard.
Theatres are bordered by peaceful areas.
Some wars are fought in one theatre.
Newcomers are needed.
Thousands are killed.
"Some people think that self-esteem is linked to depression, eating disorders and bullying."
Some circuit boards are made plain so a person can build their own for a particular electrical task.
"Most circuit boards are made with a light sensitive covering, for photolithography."
Developer is a liquid that dissolves the covering that was exposed to light.
Velcro is patented.
Sex means whether someone was born with a male or female 'body'.
Agreement is reached on the border between Greece and the Ottoman Empire.
"Cannons are used for the first time in a European battle, the Battle of Crecy."
Gold is discovered in Australia.
"Gold is discovered in Johannesburg, South Africa."
"Some mosaics are made of round pebbles, and have only two or three colours."
Some tiles look as if they are made of pure gold.
Similar adaptations are found in cetaceans like dolphins.
Some diseases are caused by 'infection'.
Some infections are caused by different infectious agents at different times.
